step 2: pat of any excess
Put the butter into a food processor and process until smooth. Add the brown sugar and salt, and process until smooth. Transfer the mixture to a bowl and stir in the flour and pecans with a rubber spatula. Spread the mixture out over a piece of parchment or wax paper, and freeze for 20 minutes.
We may not need any more cathedrals but we do need cathedral thinkers, people who can think beyond their own lifetimes.”
I completed the ritual of the rite of passage. I deprived myself of food and sleep. I engaged in strenuous activity by climbing a mountain top. Once there I was attacked by hostile forces of nature to be rescued by my spirit guide. Osprey is my spirit guide and my totem foundation.
The Midnight Reverie Trio, The Awarians and Gasoline will get together on a special evening in order to support a good cause.
Then we drove home and went to pizza with Grandma, Papa, Ava and Grant (and Randy because he worked all day). It was delicious, and Finn was so good the entire time!
Therefore he assigns compassion as the cause of this healing. And it is great compassion to heal all, and not to require faith.
Read the Kindleboards.com forums, especially the Writers’ Cafe board – I have found it an invaluable source of knowledge and stories from people who have been self-publishing for a number of years.
You know what I just said about defense? There’s only one team that I am convinced that doesn’t need it and that’s the Flyers. Parise and Kovalchuk will provide some fireworks and Brodeur will be great (as he has thus far), but as long as the Flyers take the series seriously they’ll win a long series, even with their problems in net. Flyers in 7.
a) Reinette could briefly return in an episode like Dickens did in The Wedding Of River Song.
While this list is not entirely comprehensive of every quality I hope to instill in my children, it does get across the major points of my parenting philosophy. Without knowing it, I decided I would parent this way a long time before I had children, never knowing it was actually considered ‘attachment parenting.’ I believe in this way of behaving towards my children because it feels right to me and I cannot imagine going about this journey in any other manner. I look forward to the adults my children will become, knowing that the groundwork I lay here and now will not only benefit them and myself but everyone who chooses to walk in and out of their lives.
I thought I was the last von Niederhoffentanger
1202 **D-II/8/1995. “Someone Else Is Responsible, Not Us, For the Gunning Down of America.” The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(11), above, pp. 128-34.)
For a chance to win this beautiful and versatile stamp set, please make the rounds and leave a comment below. You have until 9:00 pm Pacific tonight to leave your comment. Good luck!
08. Master Program – Hallo (KWK mix) (6:07)
Our sweet, beautiful, loving boxer boy, Charlie Brown, has been diagnosed with terminal bone cancer.
Great vibe, too. It is undeniably the kind of place I would have hung out at in college. Edgy but still friendly, decent beer on tap, and hand-cut french fries. Nice.
I don’t run for medals. I don’t run for racing shirts or fancy gear. I don’t run for PRs. I don’t run for weight loss. I don’t run for popularity or recognition. I don’t even run for fitness. I’ll tell you why I do run though…
This wasn't going to be my First Post (boom boom!) of The Year, but then The Divine Helga reminded me of my growing Crush on Old Royalty in her post about coming over all Queen Victoria-esque: http://helgavontrollop.blogspot.com/2012/01/feels-like-touch-of-victoria.html
I felt a chill run through my body.
Last month Stephanie Decker, made a decision that would change her life forever. While getting her children ready for school one morning, a tornado suddenly touched down near her Indiana home. Rushing her two young sons to the basement, Stephanie barely had time to seek cover before the house’s windows shattered. It was during that terrifying moment that she made the split-second decision to protect her children. Stephanie wrapped both of her children in a heavy blanket and threw her body on top of them to shield them from the storm. As the storm worsened, all kinds of furniture, and wooden beams struck Stephanie as she covered her children. When the tornado subsided, Stephanie had suffered massive damage to her legs and would later have both of them partially amputated. Amazingly neither of her children experienced any injuries thanks to their mother’s bravery in the face of death.
- When playing with other children (not Piper) she is always polite enough to give them back their toys when they get upset about sharing.
And I hate me for it.
So… How ’bout them riots? Look kind of familiar to anyone? It sort of looked like a more violent version of Occupy Wall Street if you ask me. Notice that at 1:17, they were rioting in what looked like a Stock Exchange. It looks like these protesters are going to be painted as the bad guys, which means that someone in Hollywood is actually talking about OWS in a negative light. You don’t see that very often. Of course, I suppose they could always turn it around on me, and make Bruce Wayne look like a greedy rich guy, and Bane is just trying to buy the freedom of Gotham City’s poor… but somehow I doubt that’s what’s going to happen. I also think it’s funny that Warner Bros put it up on YouTube a day before the May Day Protests (which are getting kind of scary just judging by the news). It could all just be a coincidence, but knowing the genius Christopher Nolan has demonstrated in his film making, I doubt it. I’m betting he’s trying to make a statement.
And, when police are not around a park with benches still wet with fresh paint. When they are not around a park with new shrubbery providing fresh hiding spots. When they are not around any park in a neighborhood with a reputation like Whiteaker’s, one can count on trouble.
Some then underwent unnecessary procedures, some of which were badly done, according to Mr Cohen.
I had finished my thesis at 2:00 in the morning one week before. I woke up at 7 the next morning to send it off and spend the the day at work. I left work and went for a run, came home and packed, worked the whole next day and headed to Jersey. I left Wednesday and didn't sleep on the plane at all. I was jet lagged until Friday and never got a full night's sleep the whole time I was in Madrid.
the Babylonians crushed the last remnants of its “unending” power at
In the meantime, may I recommend a trip to the Lake? It’s beautiful!
What you're going through
May God bless you, because it’s through your affords to come to Africa that I got this message.
So far at least as I understand;
Sometimes I get a little resistant to change and sometimes I don't mind it. Depends on my mood, I guess.
"Me?" said the old lady with a smile on her face. And then she laughed again like a carefree young girl, "I am HOPE."
Day Tours
Lexicon word of the day: pertinacious.
It's sweet, has a little bit of chunk to it (depending upon your chopping skills, you can determine whether you want it smooth or chunky), and is by far the best tomato sauce I've ever had.
You will do the same to a German
I have used the free version of Story Builder for a couple of years and loved it so much I just bought 3 more of their other apps.
Sorta makes you want to get all the punctuation right in your cover letter.
I ventured out today throught the snow-covered streets to TOYS R US to return some things dear daughter got for Christmas. With most places have such strict return policies, I realized - HOLY COW - some people probably bought these things a few weeks before Christmas and my time is running out!
"I'm getting the change for you. Believe me, I'm not stealing, bud. 'Cuz if I am going to jail, it ain't gonna be for stealing. It's gonna be for something BIG....you know, like murder or something." And I hand him his damn 32 cents, grab my bag and walk away.
In earlier days, our ancestor's observed fasts on specific days of the months and even certain types of fasts for a specified period of the year.
I have learned many things and I know if I am going to take up similar kind of startup project it will now take less time. I can pre-empt many problems based on the experiences I have gathered this time.
Can you imagine the groom at the end of the aisle waiting to see his bride and she looks completely different? He is marrying you for you and think your perfect just the way you are.
To: TH
When Justin and I were in our Bradley childbirth class, we definitely went over a “postpartum” chapter and our Bradley instructor did a great job. But there are just some things that you can’t be prepared for until it happens to you. I discovered in my postpartum days that there were several things I wish I had prepared for more. So I thought I would post this to try and help whoever might need it out there….it’s a bit graphic, so I apologize.
20Go, take your place in the Temple and give the people all the teaching about this Life.
Hello, my name is Irrelephant, and I'm not addicted to much.
Now most days looks more like this...
The unfurled sailboat glides on,
But what I do take great umbrage at is this sense of entitlement and presumption that Christianity alone holds the deed to the winter season. I consider that both a grave insult to this nation’s founding principles and a grotesque mockery of true spirit of the season.
Best Short
Our tax structure is a strong, direct incentive to ship American jobs overseas!
Real Ale Sisyphus 2003 & 2004
so this is when you’d just take a look at the text and that’d be that…except the text is utterly indecipherable. it resembles european alphabets of the time, but makes sense in none of them. it runs left to right and is broken into paragraphs and bullet points, but has no punctuation. it appears to be written fluidly as though the author was well-versed in the language. and in some ways it mirrors a natural language. certain letters must appear in every word, like vowels. some words appear often in one section but not in another. but in other ways, its puzzling. some words appear up to three times in a row and there are a surprising number of words with just a one letter difference. despite many attempts, no one has been able to crack it, langauge or code.
And where does that leave us career authors?
are
12. Kansas City Chiefs OT Jonathan Martin (Stanford) No team was hurt more this year then KC. Martin provides some stability at the OL and should continue to open holes for Jamaal Charles once he returns from injury.
They regard negotiating as weak, and a ploy for getting what they want.
For additional statistical information the above blog shares plenty. Remember to follow your spirit, your intuition and disallow your child to be placed in a position to which they can become violated by a perpetrator. This applies to any situation including holiday parties, and family functions.
The view was breathtaking and amazing to see actually how big Nashville really is. As I have said before, a photographer takes every chance to the fullest and I did no different. I dangerously, and I’m sure I am exaggerating a bit, climbed up on a make shift ladder and onto the roof to see the rest of the view.
Hey there, just writing to announce that issue 4 of The Bite Magazine is out now. This season’s issue includes articles on plagiarism in the design industry, more of the latest images and outfits straight from the catwalk, and gadget and music reviews written by me… and then tweaked and / or re-written by somebody else. Seems they didn’t think me capable of taking my pieces away and re-writing them myself! If only they’d asked, as opposed to telling me things had been altered (on only one article, mind you, they said nothing about editing all of my other pieces as well!) just as the magazine went public.
Isn't this exciting!?
I also found myself appreciating the way Atwood wrote Odysseus more on the reread. There's just the right mix of honesty, lies, tricks and honest deception. I liked his portrayal in Song of Achilles too, he must be one of those characters authors love to write.
When my brother and I were kids, my mom would give us the fizzy ginger ale to help settle an upset stomach. Even as I've gotten older, I've relied on this remedy from time to time, especially helpful after a fun night of too many beverages.
Take a step back, admit the truth – our children are (largely) under the assault of rote and results, exams and assessments, ranks and ratings.
I am in the process of making one of the 'Heart Blankets' up at the moment. Progress is a little slow as I am busy with my family but I am doing a little when I can.
Lightning Cup Get Gold on Leaf Cup
Wrap up your finished pastry and place in the freezer for at least 8 hours or overnight.
One at a time, my older three came outside to say goodnight and receive their bedtime hugs. They promised to brush their teeth. We parted ways for the night with declarations of love.
Hello my scrapping sistas, just wanted to show you some of my LOs I have completed. I haven't done many LOs this year, kinda been working on my mix media / art journal skills. Then I have those mini albums I have been making for others that I finally completed.
It is emotionally abusive to ask me to do something, only asking because you want to benefit from the thing you’re asking me to do, and when I use the power I have to say NO, you began degrading me claiming, “You’re not healed. You think you’re healed but you aren’t healed.” You continue with a condescending tone, “You need to be delivered, something is wrong with you.”
You’re done! You can get really creative and add glitter or 3D elements to your letters. Heck, if you don’t want to paint them, you could create collages with decoupage, cover them in fabric, even stain them and use a woodburning tool. Also, if you don’t know any kids, this is a nice gift idea for a monogram for a newly married couple, or even for yourself to spell out inspirational words on your own wall.
I'll have a roundup of all the Cook the Books posts about Outlaw Cook after the January 23 deadline, so be sure to stop back to see all the submissions. Next up for our book club is Roald Dahl's childhood classic, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, which will be hosted by Deb during February/March. Happy reading and eating!
And then, whoosh! The baby slithered out like a slippery fish. It was such a funny, unexpected, amazing, thrilling feeling.
He further argues that the government has the duty to intervene to address rising population growth and other related problems by making policies “that will increase the capacity of women to participate in the labor market, invest in health to decrease child mortality and enhance education, particularly of women.”
Roaming around the horse stables and exercise area was a real eye opener for me.
The retail price then will be $18.95, but you can get a hefty 32% pre-release discount from Amazon.com by going here ASAP.
This is in tribute to the famous religious leader of the Buddhist beliefs who is Dalai Lama. He serves as the leader of the Tibetan Buddhism branch. Did you even know that Dalai Lama means the highest priest of ocean? An entire Dalai Lama tour would render you experiences of amazing trekking and see the most stunning and amazing places to give you more serenity and allow you to relax while keeping in touch with your spiritual side.
Give him a padded cell for thinkin’ he could-a been
Since we are in the 10th month already - we are going to be challenging you to use 10of something on your projects! It can be 10 buttons, 10 flowers, 10 letters in your title, 10 journaling strips, even 10 photos or 10 of anything else you can think of!! (can you use 10 different papers????) :)
Irelandis close to the top of the league of developed countries for producing babies on a birth rate basis with 15.5 births per 1,000 head of population per year. That compares with 12 and below for our EU neighbours. On a fertility rate basis, average number of babies per woman we are also close to the top of the developed world league with 1.96 babies per woman. That compares with 1.82 in theUK for example. So in terms of the developed world, we’re doing our bit to ensure there will be an adequate supply of Irish into the future, though our birth and fertility rates are significantly below those in the undeveloped world. However, from the point of view of shrinking household size, we’re not interested in our world rankings today but in changes to Irish birth rates. Oddly enough our birthrates have been holding up remarkably and although we are no longer at 22 per 1000 that we had between the 50s and 70s, we are up from the lows of 14s in the 1990s.
Ban will give a speech before the country’s parliament on Monday and will show the international community’s support for Myanmar’s democratic reforms. Ban will be the first foreign leader to give a speech in the parliament. He will call on the country to stay on the track toward democracy.
Len said it had beauty and was sharp and menacing. Bruno called it dancing and choreography of the highest quality. Carrie Ann said her legs are the best legs she sees on DWTS ever and called the dance poetry in motion.
at least for a few weeks until she goes back to the dr and we see what's next.
Have you already found your Mr. Big? Although affairs should never be condoned, a girl can't help but feel weak in the knees at the mention of Louis Vuitton, Marc Jacobs, and Christian Louboutin. One look at their latest collections is guaranteed to make your heart skip a beat. Submit to your inner handbag obsession and stack this timeless bracelet next to your other gems.
“Miss Broadway”
Rain or Shine’s advantage of stretching the floor with their long range bombers seemed to be invincible too. The Extra Rice Incorporated clogged the inside lanes, yet seemed to injured their pulse in hitting the strides, struggling and losing life on its own.
Economic initiative of the Week
-Bekster
Friday and Saturday 11 - 4p
Her coat is beautiful, but the rest of her? Ehhhhhhhh. Ah well, now that she is back with us she is already gaining some weight back. Elvis is a little tank and it takes work for her to keep him looking so thick! (Early I incorrectly stated that he is cutting bred... he's actually rope bred, and will grow up to be a rope horse like his original momma.) Of course, she's still beautiful either way. :)
“Why would I do that? Morgan is awesome.”
37 been
Many other innovative programs will be part of the Green Economy initiave. All of them represent an investment in our industry, and our future. The advantages of going green vs. buying fossil fuels — either abroad or at home, is the same as paying a mortgage on a house you own vs. giving rent to someone else.
Each year as we are just finishing decorating our Christmas tree, it starts. THE competition to see who hangs the LAST ornament! Each of them "pocket" a few and keep an eye on the other to see when brother's hands are finally empty.
It felt strange in that position to find her clit at the bottom of her cunt, with my top lip nestling between the labia as I found the bud and licked it joyfully while she sucked me; I wrapped my arms around her waist for a minute as if we were dancing.
"Take It All" - Nine
As most if not all of you will know, a broken heart doesn’t allow you see a half full cup, or even a half empty cup – it sees a totally empty world, one devoid of hopes, dreams etcetera. Yep, I can be an emo when I want to be…
An Extreme Form of Hypochondria?
Add your name to Mr Linky.
Jill's horrible death, and the subsequent healing process, has been a journey for me. I've learned so much along this journey - mostly things I wish I never had to learn, but also things I'm grateful for having learned. I've learned a lot about who I am, and what I'm capable of, and what my limitations are. I've learned about what matters and what doesn't, and what love and friendship and commitment mean to me. I've learned about my relationship with God, and that although Jill's suffering and death shattered my faith, it can still be put back together again once I find all the pieces - and I will find them. I've learned that no matter how dark the night gets, the sun will always rise tomorrow and bring with it a new day, a new chance to live and breathe and think and feel; and that the fragility of life is what makes it so valuable and beautiful. I've learned to appreciate every single moment I spend with the people I love - to take nothing for granted and to treat each day with them as if it were my last. I've learned that what we do in this world really does matter - the lives we touch, the moments we share, the love we give to others - because those are the things that the people we leave behind will always remember after we're gone. I've learned that life goes on, no matter how much we hurt, and that even death can't take away a lifetime of memories. For all of these things I am truly thankful. But I would trade it all in a heartbeat, just to see her again. Just to see the smile in her eyes one more time.
Don't forget you can WIN a copy of Stella Makes Good on this blog, check out my previous post. You have til the 7th to leave a comment on the Giveaway post. Go check out my review and enter.
I made just one card this week.
SH: But you should have reminded me.
I know, it's nuts not to monetize the one thing people are desperate to get: query help. Sorry. I like to make my money the old fashioned way: sell my client's books. You'll just have to settle for this being absolutely free. And effective.
Help Victoria celebrate today by taking a look at "The Ash-Born Boy," and don't forget to buy/order/pick up your own paperback copy of THE NEAR WITCH! If you know anything about me or this blog you'll know that I LOVED TNW and I think everyone should read it! If you'd like to read my review of the novel, you can find it here.
In reality, we said, "RED! RED! RED! RED! RED! RED!" I'm pretty sure no one in our section knew what the fuck was going on for the rest of the show, thanks to all the screaming through the dialogue.
Anyway, I got home to a crock pot full of pork tenderloin and bbq sauce. Easy as shit, delicious.
the imagined one in the romantic story related to him by his
Yesterday we made brownies with coconut flour, unsweetened cocoa powder, honey and eggs. Today I made a chocolate/hazelnut bread spread which they can eat on the coconut flour bread I bake... or with apple slices... or just a spoonful at a time.
Some of this was displayed today when I watched a debate live on my laptop. Today is a rare day in British political history. We have a referendum on the voting system. But the debate in parliament today was about something different. It was about social housing (public housing) in London. The debate was not connected to any government bill, so it was always going to be poorly attended. Being on the day of the referendum, this made a low turnout even more likely.
Across the Universe by Beth Revis
I have hope for our reunion and believe (when it comes) that we will all be happy. Uncle Herbert has sent me letters (a letter?). I understand that Zelda had sent you a letter and made you happy, just at the new year.
Depending on how many public keys you’ve already collected, and how many key pairs you have already generated, your window may display more information than my screenshot below. As you can see, my test user Joe User has just a single key pair that we’re going to back up. I’ve highlighted this key by left-clicking once on it.
Stewart and English were given 12 months' jail and Mylotte, described by Judge Cohen as the "lynch pin" behind the offences, 18 months.
Muslims, on the other hand, seem to spend much time stressing man’s difference and inferiority to Allah, or God. Indeed such a distinction or difference is absolutely essential to Islam and therefore to the lives and beliefs of all Muslims (except, perhaps, the Sufis, etc.).
Yes, I indeed wet my pants. I didn't know if I should laugh or cry.
Set one third of it aside.
As Otolaryngologist-in-Chief at Mt. Sinai Hospital in Toronto, Noyek began working with ENT (ear, nose, throat) specialists in Israel in 1972, then expanded to working collaboratively with physicians in the Arab world in 1982, and in 1995, at the request of King Hussein of Jordan, CISEPO took on the mission of building bridges to peace through medicine, public health, and scientific cooperation among health professionals– no matter what their faith, politics, culture or nationality might be.
This year she was able to walk around the splash park. We couldn't figure out how or when the fountains turned on, so I tried to keep a close eye on Madison so she wasn't standing directly over a fountain when it turned on. Well, she wanted to play and not be bothered too much by mom, when she was standing right in the middle of a ring of fountains. The fountains turned on and soon she was surrounded by a small ring of fountains shooting water straight into the air. She was definitely shocked, but luckily okay and thought it was kind of funny.
Karen Marley’s fashion sense is in her blood. Although most people remember Bob for his music, he threw down some seriously sharp outfits back in the day that denim and surf brands all over the world still reference. Karen spent time in London as an interior designer until she moved to Los Angeles where she works on several creative business projects with the family including designing with her sister, Cedella and her line Catch a Fire. She has a major flair for fashion and a passion for finding unique vintage that represents her eclectic style.
This flush that stains my cheeks
Here's a recipe for DIY 'Nilla Wafers (Once again, I bet you have all of it already!):
So braid your two narrow strips and you end up with something like this (I rolled it up for the purpose of this photo but you can see the two ends at the bottom of the photo...the ends that I didn't cut all the way through. It's sort of Rapunzel-esque.
I started by thinking about circumstances, and then hone and edit for months until I have a character I believe is real. From there, I head into plot, often cutting the hundreds of pages it took to get there. The characters are their own, and not based on anything but my imagination.
Green Man at Ashbourne, catching up with old friends, one of whom is not well, J hadnt seen them for 4 years and we are old skiing mates so lots to catch up on.
Where to find Dollars and Sense:
Awkwardly touching and avoiding
“I now pronounce you happily married,” said Peter, and the two women kissed.
and there it is again —
Thanks to Arlene Christmas that headed the fundraising.
So, now I am puffy, and gritty, and I have to swab my eyes with Vaseline for five days.
08 True Life Blues 6:27
Bowie
This morning I stepped out onto the patio before waking up Ladybug for school. Jed left for some lucky place in Georgia early this morning and it was particularly quiet for seven am around here. I even left the dogs in their bed (and my bed) while I snapped this shot of the backyard.
The free lord King of England,
Politicians know all about poetic speaking. When Barack Obama gives his televised address in the Oval Office, he is myth-casting and he knows it. MLK’s speech before the Lincoln Memorial on August 28 1963 is also an example of a poetic truth-event. For journalists and critics, poetic speech from politicians and political candidates is bread and butter. Critics of the media know a sound-bite when they hear it. I recently overheard radio talk-show hosts speaking about ‘green tape’ and I felt frustrated because I knew it was a poetic truth that I could do nothing about. At the same time, I know innovative thinkers and entrepreneurs could not create and achieve as they do without drawing on the resources of poetic truth. I am not sure about poetic speaking; but I am generally in favour of poetic truth.
"PROLOGUE.
* "Let's be invincible in every fight."
Not a few commentators, such as this, are questioning whether Manmohan Singh's visit to Afghanistan at this time was altogether wise, but questions also need to be asked about the emphasis of British policy in the region, which is showing clear favouritism to India.
So fight Marxist academicians and vanguards everywhere, but let’s be fair about whose saying what. If one wants to counter Dr. Kliman on anything other than framing, then one must cite places in which it is clear that Kliman is misreading Graeber.
The appearance of the hair depends largely on the health of the cuticle, the protective sheath of the whole hair. -Dr. Neil Persadsingh-
To the contrary, as Dad looked across the table at me,
Freddie did share many of his Church Avenue Trolley stories with us. From squashing pennies on the rails to making late night explosions on the high wires by throwing a metal pipe up at the lines, hoping to arc them both at once, and causing something to blow. I guess it did work sometimes, because Freddie told us many stories about being chased by the cops up our block too.
Even if the runs don’t raise my lactate threshold, they are good pacing practice. I’m becoming very familiar with the “feel” of the different speeds. This will come in handy on marathon day, when I start slow and finish faster.
‘The Time Has Come’: Ban Ki-moon’s Historic Speech on LGBT Rights … – Joseph Huff-Hannon (James Aronson Award for Social Justice Journalism / Livingston Award for Young Journalists) – Posted: 03/23/2012 9:44 am
Yes, the administration needed to get started would be a challenge. So I would like to see something along the lines of, if not actually, the University of Georgia’s Principles of Market Research Certificate, which is already endorsed by ESOMAR, as the standard. The coverage of the course is comprehensive, up to date, and accessible online. Also, the supporting text books are some of the most practical and actionable I have read on both market research and marketing. I used the qualification to raise standards and encourage career enhancement in Nielsen Japan (in both the Customised and Retail tracking divisions) in the early 2000′s. Around two dozen staffers sat the exams at a time which coincided with some of the most successful performance in the business.
We'll also have some extra guests this month from the Brewpub and Brewery Operations class.
31.3.1997
2. Tupac is dead.
Here is my entry...
fresh gratons popping in grease, and beaucoup Cajun food vendors. One was even serving a rib-eye steak ettouffe.
It’s all just posturing. By the time the real claims arrive, BP will likely be very deeply mired in interminable Chapter 11 and/or subsequent proceedings, and the little man will be dead broke and waiting for years to see if he may ever get a single penny for what he worked long and hard to build up, whether he’s Forrest Gump in Terrebonne Parish or Mr. Bean in Coventry.
Do you ever get sick of turning off the lights after everybody? I know I do. Well it got me thinking, how can I get them to start turning off the lights? Hit them where it hurts!
Switch on computer.
it's really fast and easy to make, and i like the firm texture and golden colors that the mandarin oranges and pineapple add to the mix (don't use fresh or frozen pineapple in gelatin, it won't set). i also love the purplish shade of the blueberries and cranberries combined. i prefer to use canned fruit that's packed in natural juices, and 7-up is all natural flavors now too. using these liquids instead of just more water adds better flavor to the jelly, i think. this recipe makes a pretty large bowl, so you can halve it.
3. Evil Sorcerers
Mummers and the story of St George - aided I am sure by plenty of pints of local beer!!
This one has a horizontal masked band, which was inked with Bashful Blue and Almost Amethyst, using duster brushes. It was then simply stamped with the Penny Black tree and the Tim Holtz birds on a line. Easy Peasy lemon squeezy!
BB1 – 4.5 million (average)
a Colombian woman and her thick-headed kids
On Thursday, I went to lunch with my friends Stephanie and Liz, which was pretty funny because we ended up sticking around the cafeteria for an hour making origami things out of napkins. I didn’t make a crane, but Stephanie and Liz both made them, so we named one of them, Seneca Crane, which if you haven’t read The Hunger Games, shame on you. Go read those books! Right now I’m reading The Hunger But Mainly Death Games, which is the parody to The Hunger Games. It’s hilarious!
Current Weight: 13st 4lb - 186lbs
It is a bittersweet time because we will miss the men Brett has been coaching with the last three years. I will really miss the wives. However, I am thankful for the time I had with them and the wisdom they have shared with me as I am about ready to join the crazy life football families lead. Thank you Kelli, Solmaz, Keonna, and Heather for helping prepare me to be a football wife, or at least give me a taste of what it's like.
The first is the one you would expect. I am now busy with all kinds of teaching related activities. Preparing seminars and lectures, planning ahead for the term, reading the texts I shall be teaching, reminding myself of the theories I need to cover and, oh yes, teaching the classes themselves. As a result, the time I have to dedicate to writing has been vastly truncated. Where, in the summer, I had the luxury of time, now, if I want to write, I have to squeeze it in around my work. You would think the result would be less writing.
According to Barna research, 66% of churchgoing Americans say they have “felt a real and personal connection with God” there. If we are grading on the same scale as my kids’ schools, that translates to a D-. Just barely passing. And that only accounts for those who have had such an experience without accounting for frequency, so it could have been only once for some of them. Barna reports that 44% of churchgoers feel a connection with God at church on a weekly basis. Eighteen percent say monthly.
It's one of those life exercises that is good for the soul.
We emailed the agent and heard back the next day that an offer had already been placed, it was basically off the market.
ease into the music
Thanks so much to all who have expressed interest in joining our DT, we are carefully checking out all of the blogs and arguing about our favourites (joking) and will be announcing our new members on Monday so, if you are waiting with baited breath to see whether you will be joining us, check back then!
Anthony Demas, 61, New York, N.Y.
At the end of it all. Enjoy what you doing. Remember, its social media and unless you try to be social you cannot deliver.
Step Three – Score every 1” each side of your centre line (within the narrow border you created with your guide line – see the picture below for reference) until you have 4 lines either side.
So that is it I think. My poor me middle class problems.
1. a page a day
Whee.
The show is not your ordinary show, it stands out from the rest which is what makes it successful to young children and to also to people who like the show.
The hearing is set to continue Tuesday.
Gram Parsons
And Hollister.
www.ConnecticutSedationDentist.com
This was my second night on this fight, and it was already significantly easier. Don’t know how much is familiarity and how much is the scaling* nerf.
YES says Jonathan Craig, DUP member of Policing Board
- Don’t walk with too much stuff! If you are overwhelmed by your bags and stuff, you aren’t as aware of your surroundings. Stay Safe!
R: What can people do to help?
Thus, when The Thin Red Line approached in December of 1998, I was just 20 and had never heard of Terrence Malick. There was a specific image in the trailer that gripped me, that of Ben Chaplin’s character Bell’s wife, played by Miranda Otto, on a swing, the frame flipped upside-down, while on the soundtrack what sounded like a dive-bomber’s engine roared. I only knew I had to see that movie.
And that was just the theme music. Something I had forgotten but which brought back more than memories of an old TV show, but memories of an entire period in my life, which wasn't necessarily a particularly easy period.
I will post a photograph of the work in stages, and might get around to posting one of the painting me and Roarke did! We did have help from his “Edward” train, but I was quite proud of the result!
I think the noise level was higher than at the average US show. Adjacent booths had competing presentations and of course they amplified them to the maximum. I found it hard to linger near certain booths. A high noise level is common in any Thai entertainment venue. Perhaps it’s just that I am old.
My Islam is falling 1,000 miles per hour into no mind
Knows It’s Wrong
So far, the worst rating for this beer over at Beer Advocate is a C+. That may not be enough in itself to make honor roll, but when averaged out over several reviews, Winter Bock makes the list. I like Gordon Biersch, not simply for their beer but for their customer service, which I'll delve into after the new year, perhaps.
Cheers and happy trails,
I love that Monelle chose to hang a gorgeous chandelier in this small space. Don't be afraid to create and design your own lighting - in fact - less light often makes small spaces appear smaller.
Part of our over-preparation also involved creating fantasies about what our experience would be like. We supposed we would spend our evenings after dinner sitting on the camping chairs huddled near the heater and lantern, reading. As it was, when I did open a book, it was more because I had planned to do this than because I truly wanted to read. Watching the campfire was much more appealing.
But finally, someone sympathizes with my not-so-ladylike tendencies with a very ladylike accessory...
We also figured that we can use the bed to grow some grains for our goats. I am thinking either alfalfa, millet or amaranth will be a good way to go. Something we can toss down with a minimum of irrigation and grow for goat fodder. We should be able to convert a decent chunk of our side yard to grain production, which will be phenomenal.
When we see a precious blossom,
Little Dash (short for Dasher) was impounded as a stray at large on December 21st. Just an eight week old pup he was almost starved literally to death. Add to that pneumonia and a really bad case of worms and you’ve got a really sick little puppy that may very well not recover. Here’s how he looked when he was first taken into the shelter.
So, a butterfly wedding theme is a perfect way to symbolize new life as a married couple.
you have a right to choose what you want your child to see or not see. Use it. I know I would.
I try to fit in and I want to be liked,
The backhoe scoops the dirt.
Surprisingly, the bold controls able-bodied appliance dual-analog, although I still adopt my C-buttons for strafing. AI is in actuality the aloft as it was in 2000, which isn't necessarily a bad thing. Enemies are acute abundant to hunt you, yield awning abaft walls, abandonment or go kung-fu and action if disarmed, and investigate analytical sounds and objects; but they're not so acute that you can't still toy with them and set up adequately attainable ambushes. In fact, abreast from the animation and ambassador itself, about aggregate in the XBLA absolution is identical to the N64 original.
I'd also like to take a second to send my condolences to anyone effected by the earth quakes and tsunami's in Japan. One of my best friends and his girlfriend headed to Japan on Wednesday, and I hope the best for them and their travels.
The blind man thinks for a second, shakes his head, and mutters, "Nah...not if I'm gonna have to explain it five times."
Thank you ladies for such beautiful work! So proud to work with talented designers.
The marines’ chosen name for their female aides is bams, from big-assed marines.
Now then we spin the clock hands forward another twenty years and here is the same cover again, in even sharper detail courtesy of further advances in the art of digital scanning and looky looky!
To my chagrin, she had nodded, looking relieved before quietly wearing back her clothes. There were no need for words and none were said as she left.
Deaf Havana return to our ears with new album, ‘Fools and Worthless liars’ and what better way to celebrate than an in store acoustic session with the band?
Some Wedha and Jain manuscripts, among others, the Ramayana and the Mahabharata it contains evidence of historical and technological overview of Rama's dynasty which is believed to have experienced the golden age of the seven main cities 'Seven Rishi City' which is one of Mohenjo Daroo (Northern Pakistan).
May 3 is near and let us see if they will be releasing these for their users.
“Lifeonland’s three-track debut showcases a band with a vital sound that has sparkling psychedelic overtones that becomes even more endearing with repeated plays. ‘Siege’ has swarthy vocals to the fore and evokes memories of ‘Silver Machine’ by Hawkwind, The Byrds ‘Eight Miles High’ and the better aspects of Ocean Colour Scene. The melody on ‘Regrets and Chances’ really soars, with hints of Jim Morrison in a truly fine vocal performance that glides along above hypnotic raga rock rhythms. ‘Blind’ takes a more world-weary approach applied to a similar musical blueprint. It might work better for radio if shortened a tad? That said, Lifeonland possess a distinctive sound and style that helps them stand aside in today’s sonic hurly-burly.”
Web site: www.mediaexcel.com
Step 4: Apply paint
Can circumstances possibly
Can I get a drum roll, please?
There is a popular theory that none of us actually exist at all and that we are in fact just a conscious stream of thought made up by some cosmic being, and in fact we could all be actively living out some alternative version of hell right here in this very little world. It kind of makes sense considering everything that goes on outside of our windows every day. I have often thought, when confronted by the brain dead mouth breathers that often stand before me with barely enough brain power to motor their own life support systems (i.e. breathing), that I must have done something incredibly evil in a past lifetime to warrant being surrounded by the folk that I am lucky enough to call “my fellow humans.” It’s obvious to me now, people aren’t really people, they are in fact demons in human form, I am in hell, and this is my eternal torment.
What exactly are they celebrating? How many know anything about Rasul pookutty the man behind Black, Saawariya, and Gajni and exceptionally talented sound mixer?
Do I recommend The Portrait of a Lady? Why yes. Yes I do. Mr. James may have something to offer after all.
Anyway, I want to thank all of you for reading my blog this past year. Thank you to everyone who has taken the time to leave me comments here and write me emails. Hearing from you guys really does make my day! :) I hope you all have a totally awesome 2009! Did I just write "totally awesome"? What year is it again??? LOL!
Share the Love,
Such a strong southern Korean accent, they had to put translation on the bottom. Of course I understand the whole thing. In fact I used to talk like that.
Heeeeellllllloooooooo Blog Readers!!! :) Live TV ended earlier than I thought it would, which meant that we were able to watch Euphoria (Part 1) TONIGHT!!! :) However, I think I might have oversold it to Charlie :/ I told him it was the best episode so far that he had seen, which I knew I shouldn’t have done. He ended up having too higher expectations and consequently he didn’t enjoy it as much. The episode is very good though, and the real key thing is that it is a double episode, with the cliffhanger being “the original patient has died, will Foreman follow?” which is really brilliantly done :) I remember loving these episodes because of the drama, but he doesn’t seem to enjoy the show for it’s drama quite so much. He clearly does not have the sophistication I have in his choice of TV ;) He did say he liked it, it just wasn’t the best ever. Trouble is, the drama is really what makes House so great, and the best episodes are the most dramatic ones (the Season 2 finale, the one with the gunman who holds House ransom, the Season 4 2-part finale, all the other great ones), so if he doesn’t love it for the drama, there is little else, except for the episodes that are just hilarious ;) Oh well, part 2 tomorrow, looking forward to that one :)
This week has been nice and busy. I was feeling a little physically burnt out, so I took a break from training. I guess we'll see in my bike races this weekend whether that was a good thing or a bad thing.
While many African American communities braid hair, I hadn't known that it is held in such high regard in Sudan. The intricacy of the braids, the narrowness and style means something. It is a mark of honor to be known as A Good Braider. Once upon a time, Violet's mother was such a woman. Violet herself hopes to be known as one.
In September 1916, five years after reports of Bingham’s expedition to Machu Picchu had been published, the German engineer Carl Haenel wrote a letter to a Berlin newspaper that claimed that the explorer JM von Hassel, his fellow countryman, had actually beaten Bingham to the ruins by a year. His letter went on to claim that it was only the outbreak of the First World War that prevented a major German expedition to the Inca city, which he referred to as “Tampu Tocco”. Hanael also claimed that von Hassel had written up an account of this expedition in as part of a paper entitled “Vias de la Montana” which was published in the northern Peruvian jungle city of Iquitos in 1909. This paper showed the results of a survey von Hassel had carried out with the Peruvian Water Board in the early 20th century, on behalf of the government, to find possible rail, road and water routes within the Cuzco region which might be used to open up the area to commercial development. However, despite Haenel’s claims von Hassel’s paper has no mention of the discovery of any ruins and makes only vague references to locations that might have any semblance to Machu Picchu or its surroundings. Nevertheless in 1904 he did produce a map of the region as a result of an earlier survey for the Peruvian water board upon which “Cerro Machu Pichu” was marked.
If you are in a hurry, don't start to talk to a group of women about their experiences giving birth.
Marriage is patterned after Christ’s covenant relationship to his redeemed people, the church. And therefore, the highest meaning and the most ultimate purpose of marriage is to put the covenant relationship of Christ and his church on display. That is why marriage exists.…
The Braai has been adopted as the National Pastime on Heritage Day. In fact, most people have renamed it ‘National Braai Day‘. And everyone has their must have recipe for the braai. This is mine:
I expected a bright, sterile room full of masked and scrubed up surgeons and machines going ping. Instead I was inside what looked like a school five-a-side court with some curtains sectioning off some gurneys.
“Hey, haven’t seen you guys at Trivia recently.”
If the messages really are from such an organization, you ought to be ashamed of yourselves. Obviously you wouldn’t make direct threats, but have no qualms about sending spam. If the messages are from an individual posing as a representative of a legitimate organization, you obviously don’t recognize the Constitutional principle of free speech, and/or are just an angry freak, and that organization needs to get on your ass.
Perhaps another option would be to go ahead and publish Chinese Whispers straight away. I’d be very open to the latter course of action (hint hint), given the novel’s groundbreaking depiction of a European crime-fighting team grappling with globalised crime. Europol, incidentally, is a very real organisation, and its website makes for fascinating reading in its own right.
HOLLY: There’s this idea that won’t let me go—four voices, four terrible secrets, one explosive murder that will connect them all… It’s a contemporary YA, sort of like TMAS and DBAW on steroids. Very emotionally charged and suspenseful and hopeful. I’ve written about two-thirds of the first draft and have gotten to the place where I’m flying a little bit blind, wondering how it will come together. I know how I want to feel at the end, though, which is a tiny lantern in the darkness.
With an interview on the horizon it’s got to be worth dedicating time in preparation, this will show you as serious and should be reflected when the big day comes. In addition to pressing your clothes and doing some homework on the employer, it is worth taking note of some interview turn offs!
Taste – mark out of 20
White Gel Pen- Sakura
I’m already pretty darn happy in life and don’t feel like I need a change. What can I get out of minimalism?
Focus on the formula I've mentioned before: What does the main character want? What's keeping him from getting it?
One might point out that Pollan’s sentence might be interpreted to say that Foer was picking a fight with sustainable meat producers in general, rather than Salatin specifically. Yet this claim would hold up little better. Although he is uncomfortable with the idea of eating their products, Foer is always respectful in his discussion of these farmers. He writes,
Five years ago I sat watching Patrick Turner and Mark Sanchez kneeling on the Rose Bowl turf, silent as Texas celebrated. From my perspective in the nosebleeds of the west stands they were pretty much the last USC players visible in the throng of streamers and burnt orange. They were both remarkably still, one knee down and one hand propped on a helmet. I remember thinking: These guys are going to lead us to another national championship. You just watched the single greatest football game you’ve ever seen, and it took maybe the greatest singular performance you’ll ever see. It’ll come again.
Santa probably gets cold, right? So, why not leave out a can of Campbells chicken and stars soup, (nothing but the best from us), directions to the microwave, (the handle sticks so make sure you slam it closed), Chapstick, (cherry flavored), and deer jerky. Sure, we could've prepared the soup ourselves but we didn't know when he'd show up and nobody likes cold soup, amiright? And okay, so the Chapstick was dug out from the bottom of Mom's purse, but it's the thought that counts, right?
PCI has been a wonderful supporter of SAS4Kids right from the beginning, and we want to thank Sara and Michael and the PCI design team for all they have done and for joining us for this Holiday Card Drive for our kids! Here is a little about our friends at Paper Creations Ink:
Job Description: Utah Pride is seeking a skilled and experienced trainer to provide LGBTQ training to professionals and community members. This person will actively build understanding and capacity for informed service delivery and increase the cultural competency of professionals throughout the state and in youth serving institutions – including Utah’s child welfare system. The Community Educator will be a part of our Advocacy and Education Department. This individual should bring 2-3 years training experience, an understanding of experiential methodology, a experience in interactive curriculum design and the know how to engage a wide range of audiences in various learning environments. This staff person will support other projects, educational panels, serve as an agency representative in community coalitions and represent Utah Pride in local and national settings.
Wishing you all a very Happy Monday ! Gary and I were experiencing very high electrical/gas bills so to put our gas bill in check we had a gas fireplace insert installed, but to do this our fireplace had to be retro-fitted, that meant building the fireplace out and making the opening taller. It was a big mess but worth all the mess for sure.
Take your space but allow room for others to join you…share the joy of life.
Left Hand Twin Sisters; Longmont, Colorado, Imperial IPA, 9.6% abv
It’s time we pointed out charity should not be needed if society was equal and there wasn’t such huge gaps in wealth between the rich and the poor. It’s time to end this unfair system and replace it with a socialist planned society based on people’s needs over the benefit of a few rich individuals.
I cleared an attic to make a new place for Francis to work. I was ruthless with the heaps of paper that had accumulated there. “Why should you remain?” I asked my old tax records and OFSTED files, “when all Francis’s letters from Michael Foot and Christopher Hitchens are gone?” One wall of boxes remained undisturbed. The Herbert Allingham archive. These are papers that have only survived because his daughters, Margery and Joyce, believed that their father’s lifetime of unappreciated labour had a value.
I think that show jumped the shark in 1998, when the movie came out. But the few years before were must-see-TV. Those were also the early years of the internet (at least for me), and I recall many an online discussion about how Mulder and Scully should evolve (if you must know, I was a strong “noromo”).
I just don’t see it with this team and I don’t think I ever will. Amare Stoudemire is not the player he once was. JR Smith drives me crazy every time he touches the ball. Carmelo is playing out of his mind right now, but he will come back to Earth sooner rather than later. However, with Tyson Chandler anchoring their defense and Steve Novak and Smith able to knock down threes, they can give any team a run for their money…just not a run at a title.
Slice the cucumber finely then put it in a colander and toss it with the salt.
This blog will be entirely uncharacteristic for me. I usually do not talk about nice things I do for people, or agvocate. This blog may encompass both.
And now, to show you just how much I deserve this award, I present this ensemble that I wore while teaching class last week:
- on your blog
building, ultimately reducing it to rubble (and annihilating
KUMPULAINEN V, MAKELA M. Influenza vaccination among healthy employees; a cost-benefit analysis. Scand J Infect Dis 1997; 29: 181-185.
General Wei Tsu Tin was sick and tired of losing men and battles to rag-tag groups of Americans. General Wei was fed up with the limitations placed upon him and his troops by the U.N. treaties. General Wei was ready to do whatever it took to win.
He goes and gets the girls dressed, one of them comes down wearing a dirty cardigan that had been missing for two weeks, only to reappear yesterday.
"Conquer Me" by Blues Traveler
Englewood is a restaurant town — and one in which many open and close frequently, due to the challenging economy. But some have managed to continue to thrive, despite the odds that are against them. One of these is Wild Nigiri — which operated under the name Wild Ginger for 15 years, and is owned by proprietor Charles Hamade.
Oh and the sentiment inside the card reads "For you Valentine"
It always seems that when kids are asked to make predictions, they always predict what will happen at the end of a story. For that reason, it's important to model predicting. I often use a fairy tale or short story to help them learn how to predict what will happen NEXT.
8th Course:
I neglected to talk about choosing fabrics for embroidery in the embroidery basics post, so created a separate post for it. A short post because you can embroider on just about anything and the end result you're going for will play a big part in determining your choice.
H - There are still some character and pacing issues to address, and some scenes are still being shifted into new places...
Many thanks to the hundreds of you that have tweeted and re-tweeted this post. Keep spreading the word. The more people that know about this … the better ;-)
During the time of his enslavement after Jefferson's death he secretly pursued his education, despite his master's declaration that he'd get a whipping if he was ever seen with a book. Peter didn't keep his desire to learn entirely to himself, however. He remembered, "All the time I was teaching all the people around me to read and write."
No excuses. Responsibility is the price you pay for accepting a job, a project, a relationship. Life Is Not Fair – Take responsibility Anyways.
and I wonder
usual, and I am happy with it's turn out. Now here's where my inspiration from Prima came in,
It was the early blossoming of spring and a girl was wandering through a garden when she discovered a cocoon hanging from the branch of a tree. It was almost time for a butterfly to emerge. Fascinated with her discovery she returned to the garden daily, enthusiastic to see all that would happen and hoping never to miss a thing.
Anyway, I digress. Last year, we made homemade scrapbook type Valentine cards with a cute photo of the boys to mail to relatives. It took a long time, but it was affordable and cute. This year I don't have that much time, but I still wanted a cute, original, and AFFORDABLE Valentine card to send to our hundreds of relatives (I exaggerate, but we have a lot of family!). If there ever is a time to send snail mail and put a stamp on an envelope, it is Valentine's Day.
Hamstring curls: 3x sets of, respectively, 15, 20 and 25 reps at maximum weight, super-setted with shoulder presses
In a “Crime & Safety” report issued by DNA/Info and detailed in AM/NY, Kensington/Boro Park ranks at the top of its list of the 5 safest Brooklyn neighborhoods and is considered the third safest neighborhood in the entire city.
McBrien said that the computer was turned over to federal law enforcement authorities at that time.
This posed a problem upon the release of the record in the summer of the next year. Most of that band had long since retired from touring and we ruled out the possibility of playing shows to support the release of the album. Instead, we planned on playing two shows in one night at Tramp’s on July 17, 1996 in New York City and tried to see if the musicians would make the trip for a long weekend.
Ted Kennedy passed, there were several video tributes ready to go. This
i even considered that jason and his friday the 13th horror series took some heat.
However, the Ladies Market in Mongkok, has been removed by the USTR from the list of Special 301 Out-of-Cycle Review of Notorious Markets, on December 20, 2011, see here.
One great perk of having a quilter in the family is that she can usually be "commissioned" into quilting something for us if we ask nicely and pay for the materials. Our friends were having a baby and I had been itching to design a chevron quilt, and this is what we came up with as a baby gift.
Literature.--Brodrick and Fremantle’ s Judgments of the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council, London, 1865. Letter to the Archbishop of Canterbury from the Bishop of Exeter, 91 pp., London, 1850. By the same to the Churchwardens of the Parish of Brampford Speke. A Pastoral Letter by the Bishop of Exeter to his Clergy on " The Present State of the Church," 126 pp., London, 1851. This last contains an Address of sympathy from thirty-seven ministers in Prussia. J. B. Mozley, Review of the Baptismal Controversy, new edition, 1895, and his Primitive Doctrine of Baptismal Regeneration, 1856. Among Mr. Gorham s publications relating to the case, the following maybe quoted: "Examination before Admission to a Benefice, by the Bishop of Exeter, followed by Refusal to Institute," London. This is the book mentioned as having been filed in the Register of the Court of Arches. The Rev. W. Goode issued a remarkable pamphlet by way of comment on the Bishop of Exeter’s Letter to the Primate above mentioned, 107 pp.
2. Good friends
There is sorrow enough in the natural way
Thank you Mom for cheering for us at on the ball field, we could hear you even when you were working the snack bar.
manita y a el le
So now I manage the condition as best I can.
But the gimmicky title…it’s oddly both the books main strength and its main weakness. ‘Time Traveller’s Guide’…eugh. I’ll admit it’s what made me pick the book up in the shop and flip though it, I imagine it’s what made many people pick the book up, but once you’ve read it it doesn’t really feel like a very accurate title. The chapters may be entitled ‘what to wear’, ‘where to stay’, ‘what to do’ etc. etc. but it does not read as a guidebook.
Mindy Pye hit a double, two singles and knocked in a run for Bucksport. Sadie Wight added an RBI double.
My ears are swollen
Thanks to all!!!
carvings, and not from the cultural heritage of modern mankind, so surely the
The story is simple. The story is not new. The only thing new is that some of the protagonists are new. Selvach Santhiran Krishnan is a witness in a death in custody case of R.Gunasegaran.
The solemnity with which this line is delivered almost makes me laugh out loud. I look back at him with an amused smile. “You think so, huh?”
I am not sure that this burger was so good as to be subversive, but it was definitely delicious and beats the pants off the cardboard offering at your local greasy spoon. I served my burger with Outback Spirit wild rosella cranberry relish one night, and with Cooper's Ale barbeque sauce the next - both combinations were good.
My quilt will call for 8 blocks per color: 4 left-facing and 4 right-facing.
I had to purchase a separate ticket for the special reunion, as I was a huge fan of Star Trek: TNG, as I grew up watching them when it first aired waaay back in 1987 – 1994. Wow, I have nostalgic memories of each of these characters on the show. Not all episodes were great, but you know, there were many outstanding well-written ones that I can still remember clearly to this day.
” I love this city,” said Collins. ” This is my last hooray so to speak in terms of when I’m done here guys I want to be able to look at the 76ers as it was when I left here as a player. I want the crowd to be here. I want to be competing for championships and I want the city to be proud of this team again.”
She said: “I grabbed the blade and just refused to let go of it. He tried to pull it away from me and in doing so he cut through 40 per cent of the tendons in my hands and almost severed a thumb.”
I ask this question as I ponder the situation that my own grandmother is currently facing. My grandmother raised six children. For the most part successful and productive citizens of society. She helped raise all 13 of her grandchildren and was even strong enough to help in the beginning years of her first great-grandchild. My grandfather died at the age of 30, leaving my grandmother widowed and alone to raise her kids. She never remarried because as someone whose beliefs are old-fashioned to most of us now a days, she believed that once you widowed, you should not remarry and focus on raising wonderful children. Which she did. My mom along with my uncles and aunts are wonderful productive human beings.
Jesus experienced this dark night of the soul prior to his public mission as he ‘wrestled with Satan’ in the wilderness. Buddha also experienced this during his process of enlightenment as he fought the ‘temptations of Mara’. It is only frightening as long as we are afraid to die. Once we realize that there is no ‘self’ left to die, a new dawn can begin. If we choose to enter and experience our own dark night we must be willing to deeply examine our past and all aspects of from an emotional level, and then accept our humanity and practice forgiveness. Then, release the past and move forward to be part of the human community.
The reality is: your life shared in the raw form is not something everyone needs a front row seat to.
The Wisteria gives the flowers in Spring, and the Virginia Creeper colours the whole area bright red on Autumn, as they are now interwoven with each other. So a two- season tunnel with a bit of ingenuity!
oh well, I can't have it all!!
Ive had a pretty lazy day, its sort of hard to read with the movement so Brittany and I have done some woolite laundry in a futile attempt to get the smell of cigarettes off of our clothes (thank goodness for American no s5moking in public places laws).
This picture was made at a time of great religious and political upheaval, and it is possible that these two ambassadors were active in Henry VIII’s court at the time of his divorce from Catherine of Aragon and his marriage to Anne Boleyn, and his rejection of the Roman Catholic Church. On the lower level of the table is a lute with a broken string, which symbolises the lack of religious harmony in the land; in front is a Lutheran hymnal which may symbolise religious harmony – there is a conflict here. There are many symbols in the painting which point to it being Good Friday, when the church remembers the crucifixion of Christ.
A Los Mochis Vacation - the antidote for civilization...
The government have announced the introduction of a new mandatory code of practice for pubs and bars. All you can drink promotions and speed drinking competitions will be banned from April, and pubs required to provide free tap water, while from October smaller measures of beer, wine and spirits must be offered and any customers appearing to be under 18 must be asked for identification. Now, I’m not going to rush to the barricades to defend all you can drink promotions, but it is naïve to think that well-run pubs have nothing to fear from this. Taken as a whole, these measures represent an unprecedented degree of interference in the way licensed premises are run, which will impose new burdens on responsible and irresponsible licensees alike.
Errrr… No. Apparently. He was my first, how would I know? But my mother in law had raised four kids, again, experience matters a lot. This was not normal.
I always thought making a crème brulee was such a big task since I didn't have the fancy schmancy blow torch and such. So I'd given up even thinking about them until a while back we were at a French restaurant and I had the most yummiest and creamiest of crème brulee's. It was so good I decided to tackle the task as soon as possible.
Bringing him inside the building wasn't any easier. He kept telling me to "sit down" and "stay here." Evidently, if I was going to bring him to the daycare, then he wanted me to stay with him too. I stayed for a few minutes and then realized I wasn't doing the teachers any favors. The screaming, crying, and tears were only being prolonged until I made my announcement that I had to leave. It took quite some time for Little Lewie to get accustomed to being left at his other daycare. It may take a month of so for him to get adjusted again. (This has not been easy on my "mommy guilt" as I'm almost in tears for the next 40 minutes as I drive to work.)
The cupcake recipe began here and ended up quite different. With so many egg whites in this batter it is somewhat like an angel food cake. They smell lovely baking and the cake is dense and lemony.
Hang clothes on the clothesline. If you don't have a clothesline you can purchase a drying rack cheaply and hang some articles of clothing to dry on hangars hung in doorways or on shower curtains.
Under the sponsorship deal between Genii Capital and Group Lotus, Proton held an option to buy the F1 team from Genii. However, Gerard Lopez, owner of Genii Capital, says that deal no longer exists. “The sponsorship agreement and the obligations of Lotus have been terminated. There is no option from Group Lotus to buy into F1 now—that option was taken over by us,” he confirmed with Autosport. “There was one, but we have taken it over now.”
A few months ago, the rep for Breyers, Klondike, Popsicle and Reese’s sent us some lovely treats. We broke open the treats during one of our monthly playdates with our daughter's friend Rebecca and her parents.
religion gives man wisdom, which is control.
I highly recommend Kumo. If you are a fish person I would definitely do dinners. If it's not your cup of tea then I would do lunch. Kids have their own set prices according to age and you can visit their website for all that info at: KUMO
This train carries lost souls
My childhood was milestoned by books; books that my parents read aloud to us at bedtime, books clandestinely poured over into the wee hours of the morning by the light of the moon, books smuggled from my older brother’s collection of inappropriate reading material. In my early years, my mother read Little House on the Prairie and the rest of the Laura Ingalls Wilder series to me and my siblings and I have done the same for our children. My husband, on the other hand, grew up in a home where magazines took precedence to books and he cannot recall ever being read to as a child. My heart ached for him the first time I heard that.
The ironic thing is that, because I was so depressed in general, I hung on to every word, every intonation that could, in the slightest, remotest degree, be regarded as positive and used it as one would a lifebelt in a stormy sea, without comprehending that all of this, all of it, was just making things worse.
I bought this beer at the same time as the Dupont Saison and finally got around to drinking it. I have come to appreciate this style of beer, though too late this year for the appropriate season. That is the traditionalist side of me; drink the right beer in the right season, with the right meal, and so on. However, there is also that "buck the system" side of me that says drink beer in whatever season you want to, and don't sweat the formalities. There is merit in both, and since I drink stouts in the summer, I can certainly drink saisons in the fall.
straddled her. Really not wanting to get her ear like I accidentally got Zara’s, Kimber (the owner) helped hold it out of the way. Zoe kept jumping, and at one point managed to get herself twisted on her side and fell on the ground. I took advantage of what usually is a good position to hold her still on the ground. Not with Zoe it didn’t work! Haha! She weaseled her way out from under me, and I’m still not sure exactly how she managed that. At one point I had her again on the ground, wrapped my leg around her to hold her still, and Kimber was on her, just trying to hold her down! That still didn’t work. Even if it did, we were too far from the outlet, my clippers didn’t reach too well to where we were… Then Kimber had a great idea – bring the dog in! Zoe, when she gets nervous, freezes. I guess she occasionally gets nervous around the dog, because she didn’t move! The rest was a breeze.
more than a few days after
I spent two hours creating the perfect curls in her hair. But you know what happens when things are turning out too perfectly don’t you? That’s right… mother nature steps in with 50 mph winds to ensure you haven’t forgotten just how powerful she really is! Still, we managed to squeeze in a few good pictures before sending her off on a night out on the town. After snapping to our hearts content, my mother-in-law and father-in-law went with me to have dinner in this little upscale Bistro in Salado, and long story short, we red-necked the place up just a little bit. I don’t think I can even tell that story, for fear that the laughter will send some poor reader into cardiac arrest, or at the very least, cause them to pee their pants. Just take my word for it, some of us don’t belong in places like that…
If you go check your validity in the System Settings, you should have the genuine badge back.
It was really the only man I trusted other than my own father. We talked about everything, to me, our awkward conversations and old married couple bickering was what made us special. For the while, I think he thought so too. Then the jobs and school came. For some reason, no matter how tough they appear to be, they always turn weak. He never said goodbye. No “thanks for the good times” just… Silence. It was two months before I left my house, spending each day lying mostly motionless in my room. It was painful, like whole body pain. I didn’t know what I did to hurt him or piss him off, if I did anything. All I knew is that I was alone again. People should NOT make you love them and then just opt out. I don’t care what race, gender, culture, or rules you live by, that’s not right.
He is giving this set to anyone who wants it.. But the catch is you have to use one on a card for Emily and then you get the rest of the set as a Thank You! How awesome is that!? All you have to do is email him at Dustin_pike@yahoo.com with your choice of image and then link it up HERE to get your full set! Please also link it up back here on Michelle's blog so we can all see it too! Then mail them to
Bus Tickets
Good news! We received word back from our social worker today that we can move ahead with the home study interviews without first having completed the Seminar that’s scheduled for May 25th, which is a huge relief! So our 3rd interview will be Thursday, April 19th at 8:30 AM. Yay! After this interview, we will only have 1 more to go! The upcoming interview will be about parenting. We’ll be discussing all of the training we just completed and talking about our views on parenting and probably about how we currently parent Lakin. She has to interview Lakin on that day as well for about 15 to 20 minutes.
Now, if Motherhood is so risky and dangerous, why all the pretty pictures of flowers? Because! (That's the answer I always give my kids). I have hundreds of irises in my backyard, and to me, they are a symbol of love. When I spent a week taking care of my grandma, my brother was good to go out and divide Grandma’s irises and give me a bag with all different colors bulbs to take home. Grandma died in 2010, but I still have all her irises in my yard to remind me of her.
a few of the companies at the show. It's a fun/crazy/hectic/exhillarating
and then, of course,
registered trademarks of VERITAS Software Corporation. VERITAS and
This is great for wood burning ovens, camp fires, etc.. That way if you don’t have power you can still cook. If your not familiar with a dutch oven they start at $34.99 and go up. I own a cast iron skillet and dutch oven. I love them both. In my skillet I’ve made potatoes eggs, etc… The Dutch oven I’ve made meat loaf, bread, cobblers, chili, stew, and veggies. Basically everything you would need to live off the grid (we use it when we go camping).
Mike had the pulled pork and beef brisket. I couldn’t get more than an “Mmmmmmmm” out of him, so I tasted his meal myself. I hate pork, so, predictably, I hated the pulled pork. The beef, though, was great. It was juicy and flavorful and I would have been tempted to eat more if I didn’t have a huge plate of fish in front of me. Walt’s offers two bottles of BBQ sauce at the table (your guess is as good as mine as to which of the three sauces, original, sweet, or spicy, is in them). Mike slathered his meat with the bottle we assumed to be hot sauce (red lid), but I didn’t find it spicy at all. It tasted like you’d expect BBQ sauce to taste: sweet, smokey, and tart.
Does it matter that one day that you’ll all but slip away?
The planning application was submitted by a Mr L Callaghan late last month and has since sparked a huge outcry among local homeowners.
Into the iron arteries of Calvin.
Two friends embark on a quest for a lost buddy. On this journey, they encounter a long forgotten bet, a wedding they must crash, and a funeral that goes impossibly out of control. As they make their way through the perilous landscape, another journey begins: their inner journey through memory lane and the story of their friend--the irrepressible free-thinker Rancho, who in his unique way, touched and changed their lives.
Nina Allan; Suzanne Barbieri; Carl Barker; Mike Barrett; Ramsey Campbell; Jonathan Carroll; Adrian Chamberlin; Simon Clark; Raven Dane; Jan Edwards; Murray Ewing; Paul Finch; Christopher Fowler; Matthew Fryer; Stephen Gallagher; Cate Gardner; R.B. Harkess; Ian Hunter; Wilf Kelleher Jones; Jasper Kent; Joel Lane; Stephen Laws; Mark Lewis; Alison J Littlewood; Steve Lockley; Graham Masterton; Peter Mark May; Geoff Nelder; Kim Newman; Stan Nicholls; Martin Owton; Cas Peace; John Llewellyn Probert; Tina Rath; Steven Savile; Robert Shearman; Jim Steel; Sam Stone; Deborah Walker; Conrad Williams.
In Acts 1:8, Jesus Christ gave a commission to his disciples. He said,
We know without a doubt God did speak to Patrick about our 2nd child. When Patrick shared with me what God told him I was so happy. We wondered if we should wait a month since I had just started my next round of birth control. We decided to throw the pack away and begin trying. Less than two weeks later I was pregnant. All God.
In 1989, a large subset of the Internet was launched: the World Wide Web. The 'Web' is a massive collection of HTML pages that transmits through the Internet's hardware. You will hear the expressions 'Web 1.0', 'Web 2.0', and 'the Invisible Web' to describe these billions of web pages.
And most important, have the courage to follow your heart and intuition.
Pow pow
1) Read chapter in "Be Satisfied"
So I'm sending out a request:
There are certain points in life where you may feel dissatisfied with your current surroundings and living in the status-quo. When I graduated from University, in the summer of 2008 before the economic collapse, I encountered one of those moments and decided to hotfoot it out of the fair Isles of Britain and fly half-way around the world in escape.
The neighbor came and tilled the big garden. I've been working compost into it with the tiller. The dirt was rock hard and in big clumps so I wasn't having a lot of success, but it rained today so the ground will be softer and I should be able to really work it in a few days. Then I'll plant it with corn, tomatoes and more beans for now. Other things will follow as the season progresses.
Call to reserve your session today! 859-309-6011
Capt C. Bertani found these on the London Gazette, and I wanted to pass them along.
Still, if you consider the distribution of wealth, and the consequences of poverty, capitalist nations outstrip any regime in terms of statistical suffering.
Beer D reeked of corn. That boiling corn on the cob kind of aroma. Really off-putting compared to the other three. Sugary to the taste, but with a cleansing German hop character, citric?lemon and slightly herbal. A pleasant warming pepperiness to the finish. Overall, like sweetcorn with hops.
We would have supported Oasis if the cnuts had turned up.
I was barely able to catch the final train back to the city and just before the bad weather rolled in. I had a 2 hour layover for one of the trains and ran into Raul and Silma again. They asked if I wanted to sit with them in the cafe and wait for the train together. I accepted. We even sat together on the 2 hour train ride back to Barcelona as well. We talked as much as we could but it was really like playing a four hour game of charades.
What can we do? We can assess where we stand and then decide what we can do. But we cannot ignore it and abdicate our responsibility.
Then one day, they hatched and we were told that they all made it and they were all happy with the names I gave them.
He was compelled to follow the invitation in the cold voice. He took a step.
not everything is beautiful
You get the picture. Suffice to say, I’m kind of afraid of failure and while I realize that the rewrite exists for a reason, I cannot bring myself to just keep going. It’s the condescending perfectionist inside of me that makes my hands close the notebook and put it back on the shelf.
Her 6-year-old heart beat softer, the beat died away
In these last three years of my life through my time at Mission of Hope, I have learned something very profound. It's not the latest business technique that will give me wordly wealth. It's not the latest time management idea that will help me squeeze more into my already busy day. It's not the latest fashion trend that will make me look like I'm more important than anyone else. And it's not anything that has to do with what the world terms as successful. This profound truth is...when we love those in need, we are loving Jesus.
Oh, dogs.
So here’s a dishonourable mention to Gator69, Klem, Red Jeff, Darcy, and Rotterdam/Michigan(Sockpuppet). Mooner added himself to this list a month after I’d compiled, but had not yet published it. Support electoral fraud, so long as those darn lefties don’t get into power, eh?
And the reason that you had to care
She massaged the kink out. He came downstairs in his suit and tie and poured himself a Dewars and water. Relax. That was our only job for the day. I got dressed. The matron of honor and best man showed up and the plan was that we would get married at 3:00, drive to a nice tavern and celebrate with a drink to give the guests time to arrive back at Doris and John's and we would be home around 4:30. Easy right? Hahahaha
Dick Swiveller (The Old Curiosity Shop)
The MP for Northern Europe will represent French people in the UK, Ireland, Scandinavia and the Baltics; all told, a constituency of roughly 500,000 people spread over four million sq km. France, it seems, has realised that its 2.5 million people abroad need proper representation.
This time the Election scenario and results are quite different in many respects;
Delivery of bottled water
I'm still planning to do stucco. Not sure about stone? Aged concrete looks interesting too.
In your opinion what 5 pieces should every women own?
With the segregation going on in this town, which can be quite drastic, his neighbours and friends of his parents will never be seen in this posh part of town. And anyone that live here will ever talk to “those people”. They stay on their side of town, and we stay in our. Then we meet in school and pretend for a few hours that the divide doesn’t actually exist.
So,without further ado, meet..........
Six months later, Raina heard from a close friend of Richie’s that Laila had found out that she’d seduced her boyfriend. Turns out Richie had exaggerated the events of the day, suggesting that Raina was a bad friend to Laila and wanted him for herself. Both ladies stopped talking to one another and their friendship never recovered. Riana never bothered explaining the situation to her friend, she was hurt by the fact that Laila severed all ties with her without even asking her – clearly their friendship was disposable and insignificant. A couple of years later after Laila and Richie split up and all three friends went their separate ways.
Basically, I love this weather. The days are longer, the air is warmer, and I feel much less like shooting murderous glares at all the tourists in the city.
I can hardly believe this is happening, but I am pregnant again! This was our third cycle trying since we had to sit out four cycles. I never thought it would happen again this quickly and I am so grateful and feel so lucky and blessed.
Long story short, I managed to find a pretty cheap source of unique flours (will let you all know where shortly in another post when I compile my list) and my experiments began! Most of my family members are quite ‘anti’ towards my experiments, so sadly, I am usually the only one eating it. I figured what better way to experiment than pancakes? Not only were they simple to make, I could make them in small batches enough for myself, and the taste of the flour will feature prominently, allowing me to decide if I liked the flour or not.
The Thithi and Nakshatram on a day is based on the Sun rise and its duration during the day is determined seeing the almanac. Normally the puja is done in the morning, and the chances are for the thithi and star to last for very few minutes/hour, and also to overlap on a single day. This year this happens on fifth day of navrathiri.So Panchami and Sashti pujai and offering prasadam pertaining to thithi, and star is to be done on 5th day itself. The reason is the Panchami thithi lasts for 8min from sunrise and Sashti thithi stars, which lasts upto 5.00am of next morning (3rd October),before sun rise. Since sashti thiti does not exist during sunrise Sapthami thithi puja and prasadam offering is to be done on 3rd October, followed by Ashtami and Navami on 4th and 5th october respectively.
はち：「ラスベガスは消費者社会の薄いニセのモラルと偽善を引き剥がして、その実体を顕にする。人を商品化すること、消費者社会の心臓部、はけばけばしくラスベガスで祝われている。」……なるほどね。
This is happening now.
bike rides and wagon rides and walks.
All submissions must be received by March 30th, 2012 by midnight (12:00 a.m.) Eastern Time. The new Design Team will be announced the week of May 1st, 2012.
Anyway, I have a lot to say. And not much time to say it.
Crocodile on the Sandbank is a must-read historical mystery. As The Guardian’s Maxim Jakubowski so aptly claims, it is filled with “dastardly deeds, whirlwind romances, curious mummies and all the fun and intrigue of Egyptian excavations, with a heroine who wields a sturdy parasol rather than a magnum. Accomplished entertainment.”
As Jack is a dual citizen (American and British), he will no doubt be exposed to a variety of customs from both countries. It will be interesting to see what he picks up on.
So let's just look at the hypothetical case of a child running a high fever whose parents are out of jobs, savings, and luck. The parents can’t afford health insurance or a family physician so they take her to a hospital emergency room because by law it must treat her. There she’s diagnosed with swine flu and treated with Tamiflu. But she had to wait ten hours to be treated, and therefore many more patients and their families were needlessly exposed.
So I just got back from an awesome leadership retreat. Met a ton of people, made a lot of friends. Spent a lot of energy. Hence the tiredness and absolutely NOT wanting to talk about anything. XD
Thank you very much, Ross!
Scott called a friend who raises chickens and found out that rehabilitation might have been a possibility for Dinner. In the future he said to put the attacking rooster in a box (aka prison) for a few days, cut his spurs, let him out after a brief incarceration and see what happens. Apparently this occasionally fixes the aggression issue, but the success rate is low (hmm, that sounds about right), and we'll never know whether it would have worked on Dinner or not.
Mr Smith, from Washington state in the US, kept quiet about his secret fetish for years, but agreed to be interviewed as part of a channel Five documentary into “mechaphilia”. He is shown meeting other enthusiasts at a rally in California
She replenishes the toilet paper in the bathroom, taking out of the cupboard under the sink four rolls at a time and stacking them neatly on the shelf next to the toilet.
Continually remove the sick and dead branches and remember to try and make a clean cut. Trim the shoots right after they are established. Never cut the bottom branches that grow horizontally, as those have the potential of carrying fruits. The up-right branches need to be cut back to the same length as the horizontal branches because a symmetrical tree will produce the most fruit.
8. Sky Plus. If I could pick that up and do number 6 to it, I most certainly would.
Color all of the tree trunk. For those who have a garden anywhere it snows often in the winter, paint the tree around its base with a latex white paint. Blend it with water (half and half) to prevent the burns of the sun. Since the sun is reflected by the snow during the winter, this can often cause great damage to the tree. During the night, the chilly air will encircle the trunk and it will often crack it. This can be a dangerous condition, as those cracks are perfect places for insects that can eat your tree alive.
was to wear them at the Trunk Show Event
As Stacey sat in his kitchen stewing about all that he had seen he grew uneasy. Maybe he could make a run for it at the next port. That's it, he would pretend to be buying goods at the grocers, but instead, he would just run and hide somewhere outside the city, where Mattias would never find him. It wouldn't be too hard. He was often gone for hours when they docked. He would be long gone before anyone even knew he was missing. That was the plan, he just needed to keep his eyes open for the right time.
His work in the film industry began as a screenwriter in the late '40s with his most notable work probably being the screenplay for 1955's My Sister Eileen starring Janet Leigh and Jack Lemmon. In this same period he also did a lot of television work, including creating several shows in the late 1950s, the most famous being Peter Gunn starring Craig Stevens and Richard Diamond, Private Detective starring David Janssen and the legs of one Mary Tyler Moore.
Perhaps the most gorgeous aspect of the trip was the mist at dawn, and how it interplayed with the landscape as the sun rose, transforming the landscape and changing the mood as it changed.
I really don't know if it's the season to blame or the expectations we put upon ourselves. But here's a newsflash. There is no such thing as a perfect life on earth. But I do believe you can improve your given situation 10 fold with a slightly different outlook.
In The White Oak, the first book in the Imperfect Darkness series, Cora Alexander falls through a sinkhole and enters the underworld still alive. Her living presence threatens the tyrannical rule of Minos and the infernal judges who have hijacked the afterlife and rebuild it, trapping human souls in a mechanical computer-controlled city that lies at the core of the earth. To survive, Cora must rely on her untrustworthy guide, Minotaur, an artificial intelligence built by Minos. She is helped by a mysterious voice, and by Sybil, underworld librarian and author of each person’s book of life. Sybil’s collection holds the key to humankind’s intertwined life stories. When Cora’s own book is destroyed, Sybil gives her a magical golden pen and sends her to the underworld city to write her own destiny. Along the way, Cora finds the ghost of her dead brother, Lucas, a genius programmer who alone is capable of finding the chink in Minos’s armor. But will he be able to get Cora out alive, or will they both fall victim to the underworld trap?
I'm not certain whether Prince Fielder's Tigers uniform is airbrushed or not on his card. I'm not even sure where they snapped that picture of him.
I have always loved these. There's different versions of this dish found throughout Germany, and they appear to be adaptations of a French dish.
Whenever a young homosexual kills himself, it seems that the natural assumption amongst some on the left is that he was somehow forced into this action by 'bigots' (by which they mean anyone who disagrees with the aims of the gay lobby, like 'gay marriage' - such as the Catholic Church). But suicide, although usually committed under severe stress or whilst in the throws of mental illness, is an action that involves personal responsibility - to a greater or lesser extent. Millions of children - mostly heterosexual, but some homosexual - are bullied every day throughout the world, but only a few - possibly because they did not know how to cope with such pain - go on to take their own lives. The majority seem to survive - they choose not to commit suicide; they choose to live, even it life involves the carrying of a burdensome cross.
as if through a prism
We decided to watch, "We Bought A Zoo," starring Matt Damon and Scarlett Johansson. It is a movie based on a true story, about a single father who buys a struggling zoo, in order to give his family a fresh start.
Oh, I almost forgot I had a rather good dinner on Saturday. Steamed cod fillet, creamy fish sauce, jasmine rice and some fresh tomatoes on the side. Delicious!
To 23.5 IBU
"It just takes right breathing. The right focus. See? In…. Out…."
WE NEED YOUR SUPPORT!
Back in my mid twenties, when I was single and searching in Manhattan, I was riding the subway with a guy I was dating, and we were having a nice night, and all of a sudden he said, "You have the cutest little moustache." What?!?!? I tried to play it cool, but I was mortified. I laughed and asked him if he was serious, and he said, "Yeah, you have blonde hairs so it's hard to see, but you have a little moustache." I was so traumatized that I went home that night and shaved. Like a dude.
What to do? “Enjoy her! She’s a perk.”
JC Cassels, a native of Tampa, Florida, traces her lifelong fascination with SF/Adventure to watching Star Trek on a tiny black and white portable television aboard the family boat as a child. The Space Opera trend that followed the release of Star Wars fed an obsessive need for swashbuckling adventure set in deep space. Today, JC feeds that need by writing her own adventures, heavily inspired by 1960's television shows like Star Trek,
"Oh, for . . . er . . . cartoons yay!"
To which, at 2 or 3 years old, I replied,
I left. It wasn't a big production. Jack was showering and I was drowning and so I just quietly left. I took my keys and car but didn't bother with my phone. I didn't look back I just headed to a place where I knew I could talk to someone.
In finding a great craft, I also discovered a book I had never heard of and in fact, found the best Valentine’s Day story time ever.
Sate Burung Ayam - ayaman ( Bird Satay )
Except for that weird kid who started with our class, but dropped out during first year because his roommates moved all his shit out one day while he was at class and changed the locks, then he came back the next year. I can't blame them, really. I only had one class with him, and he prefaced absolutely everything with, "Well, when my dad worked for John Deere...." I wanted to stab him with a pencil. Honestly! What does that have to do with anything???
To be fair, I was only telling some of the people who've recently been in contact with me to fuck off and stop making me feel bad in a time that is supposed to be the happiest of my life and to maybe get a fucking grip on their 'poor you's and learn about Down syndrome instead. I did note I was only fucking pissed off about the communications that were seriously about supporting me in my fucking time of need. Gah. (I hope this doesn't count as Fuck Off - the Sequel, although I kind of see how it might. Hmmm. Also, who can guess the baby's first word?)
This week, the Sowetan reported that Cleopatra Hani, ‘the eldest daughter of slain South African Communist Party leader Chris Hani has launched a scathing attack on the ANC, saying the party has been hijacked by unscrupulous and corrupt thugs’.
The window from which my Grandmother's ghost still looks out in fear.
Thursday, March 15 from 7 - 9 PM
I nodded, and steered clear of the cage.
A ‘supervolcano’ eruption is the most catastrophic natural disaster that can hit our planet, short of an asteroid impact – and scientists now believe America’s Yellowstone is more active than we thought.
What surprise, indignation and anger I felt when HE DID NOT!
While the crust is baking, make the lemon curd. Place a stainless steel bowl over a saucepan of simmering water. Whisk together the eggs, sugar and lemon juice. Cook, whisking constantly until the mixture becomes light, thick, and frothly (about 10 minutes). Remove from the heat, cut the butter into chunks, and whisk inot the mixture until it has melted. Add the lemon zest, immediately pour the curd into the baked crust, and smooth the top.
His essence, indeed, is incomprehensible, utterly transcending all human thought; but on each of his works his glory is engraven in characters so bright, so distinct, and so illustrious, that none, however dull and illiterate, can plead ignorance as their excuse.
You are special to me, and it will forever be so.
I also believe in the allure of a woman. This is something that our younger ladies are not being taught. It is not dragging your feet around in flip flops or wearing revealing clothes. It is looking in the mirror and liking what you see. It is holding a little something back from the male persuasion. It is eye contact and not letting them see your fear. It is being able to say no to that fashion faux pair. ( I have never been one that believes knitwear makes a women look great). It is creating your own sense of style and developing a wardrobe over the years to show that.
So, this year, when I was preparing to use this book with a kindergarten class, I got smart. I went to the grocery store and bought dates, a kiwi, and peaches. I actually wanted mangoes, but the particular store that I went to didn't have any. I also prepared a CD with alphabet songs on it, to get the kids up and moving. When the students came in, I started with a song by Dr. Jean called "Phonercise." This is such a wonderful song because it has the kids stretching up to say the letter, touching their shoulders to make the letter sound, and touching their toes to say a word starting with that letter. I paused the song at letter K so that we could read the book up to letter K. We read each page, clapping the syllables for each word. This really allowed the students to be involved with the story. It also helped tremendously with the wiggles I talked about earlier. Showing them the real fruits also piqued their interest. This is such a great book for introducing new fruits and vegetables to your children. The kids told me they didn't know what dates were, so it was sort of a mini-science lesson within the language lesson. We also check any food allergies before we let the children eat anything. So, when we got to letter K in the book, I showed them the kiwi and then we finished the rest of the Dr. Jean song. After finishing the song, we went back to reading the book. It went so much better than trying to read the whole book without any kind of movement in the middle. I will always do it this way from now on!
A tip: if that middle biscuit layer (the crown) is too rounded to stack, just slice off the edge and you'll have a flat surface to keep building. And hey, a snack!
When talking about her personal style, she referred to it as "Organic Modern". I asked what this meant to her and she mentioned that it might be the use of a George Nakashima piece in a modern, clean interior. As an admitted traditionalist, the term "organic modern" seemed really fresh and inviting.
Owner of Natural Innovations
Leviticus 20:9 For everyone who curses his father or his mother shall surely be put to death. He has cursed his father or his mother. His blood shall be upon him.
Industry leaders—or incumbents—almost always win battles of sustaining innovations, regardless of how technologically challenging they are.
Thembile Sonono, 39, of Monwabisi Park said last year they handed over a rapist to Harare police.
see ya there
We wanted to return to elem3nt. We saw our selfishness for what it was. I realized the calling God placed on my heart, to be a worship leader, had to be accomplished at elem3nt.
My husband took a couple of days off (a very rare thing) and how lucky that it was at the same time as the nice weather. We ended up getting compost to mix in the front raise beds. It looks and smells so good out there. I LOVE the smell of fresh compost. Now all I need to do is get some seeds started.
With guidance and encouragement from Mr. Biggs and even a little coaching from the legendary Frank Guida, Jones decided to start his own label. In 1975, Ray used his connection with bassist Maurice Glass to enlist the mighty 35th Street Gang (AKA: Raw Soul) to back him on a recording date at Lenis Guess Studio. The first single from the self-produced session, "That Norfolk Sound" was paired with his earlier recording of "Cause You're Coming Home" and released on the newly launched Wee-Too. Ray decided to use his family's Philadelphia address on the label.
I'd written R a card (see Friday 3/23's post) and he wrote a long letter back that arrived in my mailbox today. I reread it about 8 times, crying heavily at first and slowly gaining composure as I reread it. It provided a lot of answers. But of course with the answers it raised more questions, too. Overall though I'm really glad he sent it. I feel like it provides some closure to this extremely challenging process. Later that night I got an email from R's mom. I wasn't expecting to hear from her, but what she had to say was thoughtful and caring. I'm not really sure how to respond to it - but it definitely warrants a response from me.
I'm back on the weight watchers now that I've manage to gain about 8 lbs from my low a few months ago. Though I think this last measurement was too high because I didn't work out all week and we just ate out the whole time, but the scale doesn't lie. So I took it easy on the food today, went to town on some crystal light, and now have enough points for two more beers. Problem is, the wife is going to stay out all night (probably with her boyfriend), so I can't let 'er rip on the imperial beers anyway, baby and all.
There are a bunch of these doll ornaments all over the tree and they all came from my husband's grandmother. The girls and I were thrilled when we opened the box a few years ago and discovered them inside. They are a favorite now. Note a few more "God's Eyes" on the tree.
Granted — there will be those who will still want to harm others. We have a justice system for people who commit crimes and it will be used. Extensively.
Renal Failure is the defending 2010 HBFFL champion, the defending 2010 FTWL champion, and The People's Champion. We were going to watch Sunday's games over at Joe Paterno's house, but we get the feeling he's not going to be in the mood for taco dip.
Put the lid on and barbecue for an hour or so (remember, the meat is all ready cooked, this step was just for flavor), and add new wood as needed.
Psychological Status
Ya can't fire the owner as much and we like to call radio shows and James Dolan has to go. It doesn't work like that. We just can't fire the owner,
What can a man live for with the love in his heart?
Mariella- Mariella is the newest niece and I have not been able to spend as much time with her. When I do see her she always wants to be with her mommy (go figure). She is very dependent of her mother right now. IT makes me realize how dependent I am still on my parents, both my earthly parents and heavenly parents.
Me – I don’t care what they wear as long as they are not fighting and ice is not forming when they breathe.
Come on, manners aren’t fads,
At-home testing kits for pH levels, glucose levels, and blood pressure are available in most stores that carry over-the-counter (OTC) medical products.
A person who purchases an emerging website is taking a risk, and therefore expects to earn a higher rate of return on his investment. Assuming an investor targets a 10% return, he is willing to spent $20,000 for a website that is returning $2,000 per year. The $20,000 value can be determined using a 10 times multiple.
Lawrence Anthony (17 September 1950 – 2 March 2012) was an international conservationist, environmentalist, explorer, and bestselling author.
Make these bars. Kids and librarians alike will love them! And hang onto your camera! :) - mary
I did not have much time in Madrid (less that 24 hours), but Raquel’s older brother was gracious enough to give me the express walking tour. I saw the cathedral, the palace, parliament, the exterior of the Prado, and the Place del Sol just to name a few of the sites. During the day in Madrid, I was able to see a few more friends from last semester who live in Madrid. It was a quick stop in Madrid, so I’m probably going to have to go back someday.
Now, why is buffer used at all? It's there to help reduce the deformation of shotgun pellets under firing shock, in order that they stay round and fly straighter. Get that... buffer is used to help keep shot round..... because round shot flies more true.
PS...I tried taking a picture of the Enchilada Soup this evening...let's just say it tasted WAAAY better than it looked in the picture..so I'll spare you! Which reminds me:
Banaian said on bipartisanship, “In the old days of politics, Republicans and Democrats could sit together and say ‘ok, we have a job to do. We have to balance our budget.’ There has been an absence of that. There was a drifting apart in the political realm in the last thirty years and the center isn’t holding as it did before. There are also principles that I have and principles that my opponent has that we’re not going to compromise on. We need to find a policy where our principles are upheld in a way that we can still work together.”
Now if you do ever decide to go, you do need to be prepared for queues! The event opens at 8:30am however queues begin from 7am and inside people always flock to the most sought after brands such as Illamsqua, Make Up For Ever, NYX, IGLOT amongst others.
Asks John.
This being a council that he is dealing with, he will have to wait weeks before a decisions is made; by then the flowers will have withered and died.
I can't stand the word brat in general. While I suppose I can picture what people are talking about when they use the word, I can honestly say that I don't use it myself. What upsets me about the term brat bans is how the word brat is being used as a substitute for the word child. That is unfair.
Update - the lot is SOLD! :)
Why do I have to be the other, the dreamer, the nobody? The loveless, the luckless, the scared, the confused, the scared, the scared, the scared.
galaxy ace2 is having a dual core 800mhz processor where as the galaxy ace was having 800 mhz of processor..
I mean, how can a tiny bit of leather like that have any sort of effect?
Subject to some exceptions, the accused should have a full and fair opportunity of stating his case in reply.
After a brief band meeting, we made our apologies and left.
But it said further tests would be needed to establish the cause of death.
Your posts can either be informative and/or include a recipe where your featured ingredient is the main ingredient of the dish. If you've found a new way to cook an old ingredient or discovered a new ingredient, you're more than welcome to share it with WHB.
Winner: The Rake - Very close call between all three here. The Rake's location tips the scales.
Resolutions are Made to be Broken
I disassembled the compass at the shoreside shops of Hermit Hill Rigging and cleaned the inside of the now cloudy dome. Reassembly was easy and the o-rings, diagphram and new LED lights were installed. Filling with Isopar L is messy. The fluid is first placed in the freezer for several hours(I assume to squeeze the air out). I tried a small funnel and spilled a lot of the fluid. I finally found a small tapered hose fitting from my vacuum pump and with a hose and the small funnel, finally accomplished the fill and excluded ALL the air.
He walks with me, his hand within my own.
Two bunnies snuggle together framed by blue forget-me-nots on a pastel blue background, with the words "Happy Easter!" underneath. This is a beautiful Victorian era fine art image now in the public domain.
Speaking about trust, we need to highlight that trust is connected with faith. How can we say that we believe God when we cannot trust Him? That’s why it’s written that when we believe, we do not doubt. All is connected, they link to each other!
Black is essentially an absence of light with no wavelengths being reflected. Black can be thought of as dark, mysterious and scary. It is also associated with death, hence people traditionally wearing black to funerals.
Del Rey's weird lips make her a kind of anime comic book version of Rita Hayworth, who famously said "they go to bed with Gilda but wake up with me." But Hayworth never bowed to the pressures of being an anima, of trying to be Gilda's living archetypal image, the anima rather bowed to her insistence through all the shimmering womanhood that she was indeed a woman. Her image is strong enough it can thrive even in such a prison, thus Stephen King's novella "Rita Hayworth and the Shawshank Redemption" That's why I always get a little sick watching Gilda - the feeling of suffocation caused by her seedy choice of men, nameley the very square headedand seemingly shorter than her Glenn Ford, who tries to rope her off the way those icky brothers all tried to rope BB in ... and God Created Woman (1957), by cockblocking her, stifling her libidinal-elemental archetypal freedom.
Old Scotland want no watery ware,
People living in poverty can be empowered through direct engagement in identifying the problems, defining and implementing solutions, and in evaluating the effectiveness of those solutions, thus promoting the sustainability of progress.
of their relationship. Brokers relied on their general agent to direct their
and later
Location: Route 66, Texas, USA
The completed manuscript is available upon request. Thanks for your time and consideration,
Often there are only a few large producers or, in the case of services provided to government, only a single consumer. Some businesses - drug companies, for example, have multi-billion startup costs for anyone who wants to directly compete with the pharmaceutical oligarchs.
When you’re in a pinch and need to whip up a quick dessert, or you just have a hankering for something warm and gooey, this is it. Don’t let the simplicity make you think this dessert isn’t the bees knees. This is my mum’s recipe and it’s old school and decadent. Give it a whirl and let me know how yours turns out.
Hong Kong Cakes
(knock, knock)
DQTXW Blog (dqtxwblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Walking around at intermission, I went into the quire (choir) and looked back toward the performance area just beyond the arch. The organ provided a lovely backdrop for the concert, the silhouette of which can be seen here above the screen, but it was not played.
CD: So we’re through to July. The programme has been finalised between May and June?
Despite all the details I can remember about that distant day in 1978 or 1979, I have no recollection of the most important: how Oldham beer tasted. I know I drank the Mild. That's all I drank back then, given a choice. And that was when Mild was universally available in much of the North. There's a vague memory of it being quite pleasant, but not outstanding.
Therefore, as you know how embarrassing
I am not having any weird cravings like hot dogs and cotton candy, but I am battling a major sweet tooth. All I want is chocolate chip ( fill in the blank). Cookies? Pancakes? Peanut butter? Just plain butter? Its taking serious will power to get a grip on this craving.
i know, early, right? my commute takes me past “curves” and i think it’s hilarious how crapitulists (see what i did there?) conflate any criticism with moral good now. why wouldn’t they? their trainer is a completely irrational, manipulative abuser (the tv), and it hits all their pleasure points with orchestrated precision. people who “defend” their “right” to be fat, as if pointing out that it’s an indicator of ill health is a necessary scolding of one’s own choices. no, your fucking tv hits you with that shit. let’s just actually move towards health instead. this is the shortcut. fucking retards on the painfully scenic route.
Capitalism is based on playing to your individual strengths – not everyone is good at math, and so not everyone is an engineer. The same analogy works with history … curator, politics … lobbyist, science … microbiologist. Based off the three examples I just gave you, here’s how capitalism works: A student tries hard in school and wins a merit scholarship for the university she wants to attend (which was designed by an engineer working with an architect). She’s got her mind set on having her own research firm when she graduates, so she works a job to earn money for her future instead of getting drunk and doing nothing all day. After she graduates, she sets out with her money and starts a firm with her friends. Eventually, they all go on a diving trip to discover why some tuna are dying like never before. Let’s say that they find and bring back some water samples to their firm’s lab. They find a new parasite that is killing the profitable tuna. They then publish their findings and appeal to a lobbyist to find a solution within Congress. When a solution is found and the crisis is resolved, she ends up having her picture in a museum that the curator is in charge of. That’s capitalism. Conservative ideals of working hard, keeping earned money, and individualism all support capitalism – aka, OUR system.
Goose: Those new light fixtures are bad. The block looks good now.
I was a checker and Joe was a caller. Now these bingo games had $1000 jackpots and paid out $25 - $50 cash prizes a game.
Christmas came, we celebrated big as always, Christmas went. My husband went back to work on Wednesday after Christmas. We played.
(Wall Street Journal, herroom.com)
Rachel Sharon-Krespin writes: “His (Gulen’s) followers target youth in the eighth through twelfth grades, mentor and indoctrinate them in the ışıkevi, educate them in the Fethullah schools, and prepare them for future careers in legal, political, and educational professions in order to create the ruling classes of the future Islamist, Turkish state.”
Fast forward a few weeks. I received a call from the young mom. She wanted to know if Footprints offered assistance for those who need help at Christmas. I told her we did and asked what she needed. Doing her best to hold back the tears, she told me she knew her child was just a baby, but she really wanted to have presents for her on Christmas. My heart was so heavy for her and I agreed to do what I could and within a few minutes of sending an email about the situation, we found a volunteer who was willing to help. The volunteer and her entire office stepped up to take care of this family.
Is that childish? (That’s not a rhetorical question – I want you to answer it in the comments section of this page.)
Ash’s heart grew heavy. In truth, she knew that she was destined to some terrible, dark fate. For so long, her life was filled with sadness and doubt, and one horrible thing after another. What else can I hope for?
Of course, since you are seeing a purple card on my blog, you must have figured out that there is a purple challenge that I'm playing in. Thank goodness the Predominantly Purple challenge is over at Less Is More. CAS meant I wouldn't waste too much time searching for purple supplies that I just don't have. The less time I spend working with purple the more happy I am. Maybe if I had some of that yummy SU Razzleberry paper I might have been more inspired! lol
So, I have spent much time heating, nursing, hand expressing, and more.
I am so glad we are able to talk about things and I can speak freely with Him on any subject and He is Man enough to admit when He might be wrong.
33A. Post-bail fun!
no trains.
Hi it's Kerry and I am thrilled to be a new designer for CCI. I am super excited to join the other talented ladies and to share my love of the Imagine and all Cricuts. I wasn't too sure about the Imagine when it first came out and didn't think I would get one, then the Teresa Collins Baby Boutique cartridge came out and I knew I had to have it. My husband bought me my Imagine for our anniversary last June. For someone that has a paper addiction it is definitely a must have.
From the Oxford Mail
Well back to my recipe... I love mexican food! I often have made burritos and quesidallas and other tex-mex delights. But since I'm going low carb, I needed to find a way to have my favorite flavors without the tortilla. Then the other day when I was picking up my Kombucha scoby from Nicole she had a dish similar to this bubbling away on her stove. I told her I wanted the recipe but since she left for vacation the very next day she hasn't had time to post. So I made something up myself.
"Those cobs are amazing," said Tom cornily.
Consistently sound more polished
coughing up nearly $4.4 million for a politically juiced Brooklyn nonprofit that’s under federal investigation — and that can’t even be bothered to file legally required financial documents on time.
"I'm just. . .so. . .TIRED," he'll say.
I give myself two weeks before I am begging him to come back.
We booked hotels & tours a little at a time, over a 4 month period, so we paid under $300 per month.
Chrys.: For this reason also He caused twelve baskets to remain over and above, that Judas might bear his basket. He took up the fragments, and gave them to the disciples and not to the multitudes, who were yet more imperfectly trained than the disciples.
Lower Egypt = 9 Lower Egypt governorates totally (Nile Delta)
Radiohead found themselves in a unique position in mid-2007. They had just completed their seventh studio album, In Rainbows, but their contract with Capitol had been allowed to expire. Thus, they were offered the option of signing to another label for the album's distribution, or doing it the old-fashioned way and putting it out themselves. When Wilco was faced with this decision in 2004, they chose the former. Radiohead chose the latter. Their official website became a portal for their new music, allowing fans the chance to download it directly from the band; the gimmick, however, was that they offered a business model in which those who partook of the music could pay whatever they wanted for it. To an outraged record industry, still reeling from Prince's free distribution of his most recent album, Planet Earth, it was tantamount to treason. But for Radiohead fans, long familiar with the band's interactive online experiments, it was a natural progression. The band also offered a box set with bonus goodies for those willing to cough up real cash, but the main event took place online. The album was only available for a short while before being removed from the servers in preparation for an official release, but the damage had already been done. Subsequent releases by Nine Inch Nails and others further impacted the potato Radiohead had stuck up the RIAA's tailpipe, but it was In Rainbows that made the press. Alas, everyone who had benefited from the peer-to-peer revolution knew that this day had been a long time coming.
Probably the only way to get around this one is the way a seasoned Susan Sarandon does in the remake of the film Alfie, when she dumps a disbelieving and delicious Jude Law. Do take note:
But then I see this
After naptime we drove up to Grandma and Grandpa Trenary's house where we were treated to a special birthday filet mignon dinner. It was fantastic! After dinner Kurt and I ran some last minute errands to get ready for the next day's party. Mimi and Papa broke out the crayons and gave the kids some time to color before bed. The kids were exhausted by bedtime and ready to sleep. We were ready for bed shortly after as we had a big day of celebrating ahead of us.
Four natural ingredients that could help with weight control are:
I have to make a little confession, long books scare me! I see a really big book and sometimes it does put me off. I have to say though i am trying to get over this and i have got several ‘big’ books on my TBR for example Gone With the Wind by Margaret Mitchell and White Teeth by Zadie Smith.
No one had occupied the oldest standing mansion in town permanently for years and the historical society made sure no one probably ever would. Restrictions had been placed on the home that most modern families weren’t willing to contend with and older homeowners would be too overwhelmed to be bothered. The most that could be hoped for was the occasional renter. So the mansion that encompassed every viable asset that a
3 T unsalted butter
Rare Beer Tuesday (8/31)
When you're feeling defeated, or tired...or broken...don't forget to be thankful!
This would be very much the thin end of the wedge. Because defining what is or isn't in the public interest has proven to be pretty much impossible. And once it starts how far would they go? I urge you to read these two articles from the Guardian if you want more intelligent and less hysterical comment on this.
When I started writing, the focus of the book was going to be identity. I picked a stabbing pretty much at random as the crime that Ty would witness, and thought it would remain very much in the background. But I was writing in spring/summer 2008, when there was a spate of horrific knife crimes in London. Every day the papers seemed full of terrible cases of murder, and a great deal about gangs. I learned a great deal from these reports about Ty, his milieu and the crime he’d witnessed. I started responding to politicians and commentators through his eyes.
There have been so many posts swimming around in my head of late. Things are still rather hectic here, for us at least (our lives are still only a fraction as hectic as everyone else we know, but that is intentional because no one in my home handles chaos very well, IMHO...) Throughout the days, though, I am mentally composing blog post after post.
In central Texas-area:
Acclimating to the nurses and nannies and surrogate mother-figures – most of whom who likely spoke no English. Who could not explain for him what he was going through. Who could not console him.
Mine went all blurry and in weird angles; way hideous!
When the everything is nothing at all
little walk round the side of the hotel gives you an idea of just how large it really must be inside. You’ll notice too the outdoor seating area which is right next to the river, whilst you’re allowed drinks out there I’m not sure if they’ll bring food over or let you take your food there; though if they do that is an unbeatable eating spot. The hotel lobby feels very modern and with its mood lighting and tinted windows it feels borderline futuristic. Onwards into the bar area (the actual swan inn) which is fairly enclosed with many pillars giving guests some privacy from other’s. You can also see the restaurant from here “The River Room” as they dub it, unfortunately its closed, I would have liked to have eaten there but its open after 5pm mon-sat, and from 12pm sunday. The staff were all very welcoming, though a little rushed I think.
“OK. Not bad. Not bad. But hand them the catalog, don’t ask them if they want to see it. You asking gives them the chance to say no. And when you hand it to them, have it open to the candles. Women love candles.”
So I have literally just broken the seal on a new set of test strips and I have tested for the first time since the end of January. I tested and got 10.5 mmol/L that’s not pretty, but it’s my starting point.
2. Next weekend I’ll hopefully have tickets to go see Real Madrid v. Granada en FÚTBOL. Yes. The real kind. And maybe a quick trip up to Segovia to see an awesome aqueduct and an old castle. Hopefully. This weekend will be full of hope.
D2 (daughter #2), came home for the weekend, and helped us at the Compound Sunday. We had a good laugh at Miss Izzy's expense. Miss Izzy has been on quite a roll with regards to catching rats. She has some favorite haunts around the Compound, and one of them has been a piece of black tubing used for french drains. Now we're not sure what has been living in there, but we do know something has been in there. She's never wrong!
The difference between being a sheeple in preppers clothing (i.e. spending a bunch of cash on things you don’t know how to use that will just be gathering dust in your garage 6 months from now) and being prepared is figuring out how to sprint long enough to get warmed up and then settle into a more manageable stride for the rest of the race.
8 Tips For Choosing The Right Cosmetics For Your Skin Type
Let's paint a picture shall we? Imagine... your sporting a rocking hot outfit and getting ready to head out on the town. You know exactly which shoes you want to complete your outfit, however.... whomp whomp, you can't find them! Urg, now your late. And once you do find them, they were under a pile of school books, sippy cups or piles of clothes that need to be washed, meaning, they are bent and deformed and looking a little shabby. More whomp sound effects welcome. Not a happy story. But it's definitely one that can be avoided!
Unfortunate Events series by Lemony Snicket--read 9 out of 13 (series finished) The Baudelaire orphans and their adventures trying to escape the evil Count Olaf.
06. Chrono
Assistant Engineer: Simon Birch
I did want to stop in and post this lovely picture display I made the other day.
Step 2 (In Which I Redeem Myself): I use a spatula to fold the flour into the sugar and eggs. Fold, it’s one of those recipe words that used to frighten me. Stir, I understand. Mix is easy. Blend, a little ambiguous, but okay. But fold? Folding is what I do to laundry and paper airplanes. Not a dessert. Yet I gird up my loins and plunge in with the spatula. I discover, thanks to Mom, that folding is pretty darn simple. Lift up the spatula, flip it over, repeat. I can fold!
This excellent beer comes in a gigantic bottle, one liter I think, that was mutually shared with Josh, Sarah his wife, and of course, the reviewer. I had heard about this one from Beer Advocate, especially since it was the number one rated American Porter in their numerous reviews. It is now number four. I had seen several other Thomas Hooker products on the shelf here in GA recently, but the Imperial Porter is a new one for local shops. Mine was bought at Pop's, Hwy 141.
Hand-made items include beadwork, jewlery, blankets, pottery, and more. The food court has
(*starts daydreaming and drooling*)
shirt — Carlisle (thrifted)
Once he had them sufficantly subdued he moved on to stage two, the funeral bell. It was something they used in the victorian era to alert cartakers when someone had been accidently buried alive.
Neville stopped and watched as the world diminished into a pinhole of blue and then vanished. He was alone. All around him was nothingness. Neville shivered. He wasn’t used to such quiet. It felt strange and slightly unnerving. What could it mean? How should he feel? What was he to do?
a building built against the odds;
“It is an illusion that youth is happy, an illusion of those who have lost it; but the young know they are wretched for they are full of the truthless ideal which have been instilled into them, and each time they come in contact with the real, they are bruised and wounded. It looks as if they were victims of a conspiracy; for the books they read, ideal by the necessity of selection, and the conversation of their elders, who look back upon the past through a rosy haze of forgetfulness, prepare them for an unreal life. They must discover for themselves that all they have read and all they have been told are lies, lies, lies; and each discovery is another nail driven into the body on the cross of life.”
BOSS Radio Concert Promo (Bonus Track)
Timothy J. Finnerty, 33, Glen Rock, N.J.
September 24 – Superpages.com Center, Dallas, TX
In April 2008 I was among approximately 200 Vice Chancellors, Rectors and Presidents of universities from Asia, Africa, Europe and the US at a two day Higher Education Summit for Global Development, held at the US State Department in Washington DC. The Summit was addressed by five US Secretaries, including Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice. The real emphasis throughout the Summit was only on one thing – that universities in developing countries operate in partnership with foundations so that global problems could be solved! These are private foundations and the only way to understand this emphasis is to realise the US government is owned by those who own these foundations. As an aside the inaugural address was delivered by the war criminal responsible for millions of deaths in Rwanda, trained in US military institutions, and awarded a doctorate – Dr. Paul Kagame! The very first presentation was made by the CEO of the Agha Khan Foundation!
Friday... my favorite day to Frag!!!
EFFECTS- DAY 1
Rene John-Baptiste, 21, of Plaistow, Sean Clark, 19, of Holloway, and a 16-year-old from Finsbury Park and a 17-year-old from Holloway, who cannot be named because of their ages, have all pleaded not guilty to murder.
On Sunday April the 8th we shall come together in Paris to have a hole day of memorial of Jesus offering himself and a celebration of the resurrection of Jesus. Service will be bilingual French-English.
Back garden submergible pump evidently blocked, given the river of water pouring like an ambitious creek from the back garden to the front garden...via the kitchen. Luckily I had moved the Dyson earlier or it would have floated out of the door
If your English is not good enough for making a phone call, you may use the “Assisted purchases” service from companies like Shipito. You may use the assisted purchase to buy the items that you want. Or you may use it to buy a Zulily gift card, and then pay for your order with the gift card.
By Soeren Kern, written on March 24, 2011.
I want my blog to be more "fun" and "fitting" for our family. "Bring It On" says it all... first if you have been reading you know that 75% of our time is spent with our oldest two in sports. Many of my post are about my kids and their sporting events. "Bring It On" also stands for something very different... Bentley's heart. Bentley, our youngest, was born with a heart defect and underwent major open heart surgery when she was just 9 months old. That was the reason for me starting my blog in the beginning. If you read then, you know I had a very hard time with this journey... it's not easy. It is a lifetime journey... a lifetime fight. My thoughts now... Bring it on... Bentley has been amazing and she has been a fighter since day 1. She will fight this, she is fighting this. And since life can sometimes simply be HARD in many ways... we have to keep on pushing. It can easily bring us down at times, but during those moments my thought needs to be... Bring It On. Easier said than done, I know. That's a big struggle of mine.
she did not call it
Cut 2 strips of main fabric 3"x13" for the handles.
I managed to not get sick ALL YEAR.
1. No, I don't follow Christian rules. No, I'm not a devil worshiper. Think of it this way, if Christians believe that God has many different names because of tradition and culture, you can just look at the pagan gods as other manifestations of the god that you believe in.
I once read that nostalgia is a sentimental yearning for the past. At first that seems like an appropriate definition, but if you think about it a little deeper, is it really? Isn't nostalgia more a yearning to be able to experience your favorite things for the first time all over again? It's not that you want to go back to the way things used to be. You want to experience the joy and euphoria of your "firsts" all over again because as good as they can be, your seconds, thirds, and fourths never really match your firsts.
2. (1) No person may smoke any tobacco product in any public place.
...and crawled right in. They dig straight back for a bit, and then make a sharp 90 degree turn and burrow to the side. This helps prevent predators from reaching their nest.
2) ED Texas - 54.6%
Open the lid/ foil, and fluff up the rice. Stir in the cashews and raisins, if using. Serve hot with any curry.
I counted 5 stings but there were two more I over looked. I got stung three times on my elbow. I couldn't find the Benadryl then remembered that I had given the last two to Petey when he got snake bit!!! But I did have some generic severe sinus and allergy meds, looked at the ingredients and it was the same as Benadryl. I took two! Then hit the shower, a very painful shower! Thank goodness they didn't sting me back or my face.....I am REAL lucky that 7 stings is all I got with the amount of hornets that must be in that nest; the nest is larger than a riding helmet!!!!!
I am a snacker. I am always on the lookout for healthy snacks that I enjoy. My boyfriend has healthy snacks at his place and has even bought some specially for me.
Spellbinders "LABELS FASHION BUCKLES" cut and emboss die- 9.00 BRAND NEW
The only thing observed so far :
So there you go, and even better, there is nothing to do but order. No code, no nothing.
We like to try things other than the typical American Cheese slices when we make our grilled cheese. Sometimes we use cheddar, jack, havarti, even gouda, and throw some turkey, ham or bacon in there. It's yummy to add different ingredients on different breads. You never know, you might come up with a delicious new favorite sandwich like my famous Grilled PB&J on Raisin Bread !
Of what to keep and what to purge
Tebow: 119 passes, 48.7% CMP, 6.7% TD, 2.5% INT, 9.8% sacks; 85.9 rating, 6.5 ANY/A
We came home, I gave up on the cleaning idea as I was tired from the walking. So, I pulled out my spinning wheel. I finished most of the ounce I had started back in September. When I went to get the box with the rest of the fiber, it was gone. I searched the few spots it could possibly be. I'll search a little deeper tomorrow, but I'm not holding out any hope.
And tonight,
A lesser-known case and therefore one of some interest is that of Chiang Kai Shek. He was much more like Hitler and Mussolini than Franco and Salazar were in that he very clearly came from the Left. Throughout the prewar period, Chiang had close ties with the Soviets and first gained substantial power with an explicitly communist message (see here). After he had consolidated his power, however, he attacked communism in China but retained some links with the Soviets. That he was a great nationalist is undoubted but was he also a Leftist? As with Mussolini, his later opposition to communism normally gets him labelled as a rightist but, as we have already seen, this is facile. From the French revolution on, Leftists have been very prone to murderous sibling rivalry -- arguably hating one-another more than they hate conservatives. So Chiang's falling out with Mao does not prove much. Given Chiang's thoroughly authoritarian management of Taiwan after his expulsion from the mainland, given the large State industries he created in Taiwan and given his significant welfarist policies -- his relatively peaceful land-to-the peasants reforms in particular -- I think it is clear that Chiang was just as much a national socialist as Hitler and Mussolini -- and his unabashed militarism rather completes the similarity. So Peron and and Chiang were two Fascists who survived the war with substantial power intact -- as of course also did the semi-Fascist Franco and Salazar.
The Boomers are going to ramp up Senior Housing requirements for the next several years and Albuquerque has already seen strong growth in the Senior Housing and Assisted Living markets.
Chill in freezer
Brendan: Ummm, 7 X 6 is $42.
But I'm no professional photographer, I'm just a woman with a camera who likes stories, so off I went with my non-professional camera, a tripod, and one light, and snapped away for about three or four hours. It wasn't until I uploaded the shots to my computer and looked at them that I thought, 'shit!'
Also go under the cut for the comeback stage for BoA with performance of ‘Copy&Paste’, as well as goodbye stage by FT Island with ‘Love, Love, Love’.
Review: Excellent! Interesting that it was creamy and spicy. It was like an thick, heavy alfredo sauce - but instead of an alfredo flavor it was taco flavored! We're fans. We tried it reheated and frozen and it kept its thickness very well. You could easily do a smaller shape, but we liked the long noodles. To reduce the calories a bit, I would consider 3/4 cup sour cream and salsa, and you could probably take the pasta down a 1/2 ounce or ounce.
The Pookie is also able to understand more complex directions. Instead of just "Give that toy to your sister," I can tell him, "That's your sister's toy, and this one is yours. Give your sister her toy, and you can play with yours." Of course, he doesn't always want to do it, but he does understand and he usually does it.
Reading through most of the reviews posted to Goodreads, it would appear that I am as I feared. I'm the only one making this sort of connection between the two. And I wouldn't be surprised to find out that I am completely, embarrassingly, and entirely off-base. I mean, check out this incredibly well thought out review by Bullet Review - the guy sees such a lack of tie-in to the Catholic religion that he even asks at the end of the dang thing why it's called a gospel! Yet he sees so much more than I did at first glance.
Here’s hoping I’m feeling back to normal soon! Only 11 more sleeps till the Marathon – 1 long run, 2 tempos, and a few track workouts. We are SOOOOO close.
Remember a few years ago when everybody was painting their walls Tiffany Blue? (Which Tiffany trademarked by the way.) So many people became obsessed with the delicate turquoise colour of the famous New York jewellery house that Tiffany Blue was EVERYWHERE. There were even weddings that were themed according to the colour scheme, complete with Tiffany Blue table decorations and Tiffany Blue bridesmaids.
Where can people learn more about your books?
Being the wife of a grad student with 4 children is hard enough, when you throw an illness like MS into the mix you know things are definitely not going to get easier anytime soon.
When I got to the Gladney office, I went into the conference room to wait. I was letting Ruthie Mekdes wander around in the room. She is very curious. She wandered into the hall but was still in my line of vision. When she walked out where I couldn't see her, I got up to bring her back to me. I took a couple of steps to where I could see the offices in the hall perpendicular to the one we were in. I glanced up at someone coming toward us and immediately knew it was Mekdes' mom. She walked to Mekdes and picked her up and held her. I went to grab the camera to try to capture the moment and started to sob.
& our anniversary...
“Aye, aye,” Tanner replied and turned on his heel to return down the hill to the camp below.
Let us now move forward to March of 2012, some four months later, when 12 affiliates (eleven students, one faculty) were served with arrest warrants by mail threatening eleven years each in jail, and a million dollars in damages. Half of these affiliates were pepper-sprayed and/or arrested on November 18, unfortunate casualties of that series of misunderstandings amidst the military-grade war on non-affiliates.
In this posting, I invite you see some of the things that have crossed my visual path in recent days and to reflect upon the words of various writers, photographers, and painters on the fascinating subject of "seeing." If you suspend your natural desire to understand what has been photographed, and focus, instead, on the texture, lines, and hues of the compositions, I think you will be reminded that nature itself is our greatest artist.
Will fill you all in with the details when it is done,
If you live in San Jose, California, and are looking for a fab place to hold your wedding, Hotel Valencia Santana Row might just be the place. Hotel Valencia is the only overnight establishment on Santana Row – a European-inspired neighborhood is known for its nostalgic air of romance and dynamic mix of upscale shopping, dining and entertainment. It’s perfect for the happy couple to explore together and makes a beautiful setting for wedding ceremonies and receptions.
1/2 cup chopped raisins
Yet, from one side of my brain comes the inevitable question: with all that potential, why so little production? An opposing voice appends the question with this reproach: Aha! Are you blocked?
Transfer vegetables to ricotta cheese and spinach mixture. Add 4 T of shredded cheddar and mix well.
It's very early on SUnday and I am already up. Don't know whats wrong with me at the moment, I just cant sleep :-(
Here he is!
Owen just had to take a little stroll among them.
Everyone kept saying how I must be so done with everything, and ready to have the baby since when they were at the end of their pregnancy they were so done with it themselves... and yes, I am ready to meet this baby, but not for the same reasons they were. I didn't explain to them about my sister or anything, I just kind of avoided the subject and said "Yeah, we're ready. We just don't want him to go overdue." And of course, without a proper explanation, they assume that it's for the same reasons that most people don't want to go overdue. Which isn't an invalid reason, but for me there is just so much more to it than that. I didn't bother explaining though, because I know that they wouldn't truly understand even if I had. They don't understand anything about our situation... for example, I've had to explain the need for blood thinners to my MIL several times, but she was still worried about the blood thinners hurting the baby... you know, after I told her about my sister, my losses, and how the blood thinners have possibly saved Nombie's life. My side of the family, there's no question of understanding it; my sister is scared about my OB letting me go too long, my mom is nervous... we know what can happen, and not one of us wants me to go overdue.
On an unrelated note, due to some tweaks to my plans for the rest of the Non-Agency trilogy, I've dropped the price of 'Heaven Can Wait' to 99c/75p. The changes have already gone through at Smashwords and should resolve at Amazon sometime tomorrow (Amazon have already bunged a big discount on it, for some reason). Buy it! I promise it's good!
Anyway- at the end of the email, a question is always posed to three professionals who answer with passionate opinion that is misconstrued as factual information. It is usually a hoot.
After the younger children were in bed, we sat on the couch, and we went through the aspects of his creature one by one, in great detail. Oh, can this boy be detailed! Honestly, it is hard for me to understand a lot of what he says because he devises complex point systems that I don't grasp. But I tried!
To go with the soup I made some Festive Herb Spirals, these would also make great appetizers-
Their kids were out playing in their yard, a perfect picture of a family Saturday. Mine kids were...somewhere. I think Youngest was down the street. Middle when across to another neighbor's house to hang out, and I know she was playing volleyball in that yard for a while. And Oldest? Well, his bike was parked by the walk leading up to the porch, so he had been somewhere at some point. Told you I'm bad at keeping track.
“Supporting political ideologies is legal in Malaysia.
Jealousy flows when the girl you hate is with the guy you love. Envy strikes when he notices her, not you. Competition arises when she wants to chase the athlete not the N.A.R.P (non-athlete regular person). Hearts break when this happens over and over. Comparison starts when every girl goes after the same guy. Power stands when the guy thinks he has no obligation to any of them. Desperation amounts when girls have to pretend not to have feelings. They cause the heartache, not the individual. No matter what, someone is at fault for how things turn out and more often than not, both parties are accountable.
The ability to stop time, so I wouldn't have to learn this whole "time management" thing everyone keeps talking about. :)
hugs Liz xx
Have not seen any real supermarkets yet, just what we would call delis or fresh provisions. Pret A Manger is becoming a favourite of mine – mmm, chilli bean and chicken soup.
My father tells me that my step-grandmother is failing. I should write her again, perhaps for the last time. I'm not sure how one says the things which somehow feel so awkward to say, which make it clear that you know the other person is dying. The "you have been an inspiration and have meant so much to me" things. We tend to tiptoe around death, put a bright face on and pretend that it isn't coming.
It is something you use on your body. :0) hehe
It is critical to the successful integration of the site with the rest of Lower Manhattan that Dey and Cortlandt Streets be extended as real streets between Church and Greenwich. These streets must be designed to accommodate both vehicular and pedestrian use. The public realm in New York is primarily composed of streets and sidewalks. As such, Dey and Cortlandt provide key opportunities to expand the amount of open space and accessibility into the site. Furthermore, these streets will ensure that the typical block size along Church Street remains the same as the blocks to the north and south. In New York, with few exceptions, larger block sizes (for example, blocks as long as the dimension between Liberty and Dey Streets) are provided only for our most significant public buildings such as Grand Central Station.
Yesterday I promised I would have a new line up of recipes!
But ~ if the lines in question pertain to food or drink, I can put aside my revulsion for the genre long enough to understand that others may enjoy it. The barbecue poems of Jake Adam York, for instance. If my eyes glazed reading them, it was at least a tangy barbecue glaze. Give me barbecue over barbecue poems any day, but the world is big enough for both.
Elsewhere, Hatlo refers to the contentious nature of his own marriage. This takes on a rather chilling tone when you consider that just a few years later, the artist's wife disappeared when she "fell off a cruise ship" under circumstances which were never explained. From the Oakland Tribune, September 14, 1935:
Each squad of the “mercenaries” was equipped with a Motorola communication device, the IDF said, so they could pass information to one another. Assessments in the defense establishment are that members of the group were affiliated with international global jihad elements and had undergone training in places like Afghanistan and Pakistan.
Friday: Spaghetti and Spinach
I received a complimentary copy of this book from the author.
Waking up,
By the time we rolled up on Tucumcari, I was useless. The throbbing in my head was audible, though Di denied being able to hear it. She attempted to solicit my help in directions to our anticipated repair shop, and I supported her by saying, “Guhmmphalthp. Brrthp.” I honestly don’t recall a lot of the rest of that day, but at some point in the evening we were packed into a motel room while the Blazer was resurrected. The girls, without break, moved their Squabbling War into the room and launched new offensives for new territories. Through the fog of pain, Di gently wakes me to inform me that Daughter Unit The First officially became a woman. I replied in Bantu that I was thrilled.
I've patched together a couple of Patchy Cushion covers, stitched and ric-rac'd them and now they just need their backs sorting out. No night-time sewing for me though as it's bloody freezing in the dining room where my machine lives.
Very nice detail on her striker units as you can see above, Based off the Mitsubishi zero A6M3a, they come with two sets of propellers, a stationary one as shown and a pair made to look as if they're spinning at full speed.
Oscer is the one who found me. His body is wrapped because otherwise he’d fall apart. Not from rot. He explained that, long ago, his limbs were severed. I have not seen Oscer angry. While he obviously possesses emotions, as we all do, he seems to have infinite patience and understanding.
This is where I struggle. My trust has to be in God, and I have to do and go where HE wants me to. In this case, I can feel His gently guiding hand leading me towards going all in. And I’m not gonna lie: it’s scary. The thing about it is I know that while I’m scared, He is holding my hand telling me that He’s right there…in the scariness. The heart is a tricky thing. It wants what it wants. To be loved and accepted and treasured and valued. God does all those things, and that really should be enough. I think that’s what I find most scary. That sometimes I don’t let that be enough.
-The Clockworx Gaming Team
Our very own Chairman Jack Harte is interviewed about the precarious state of the Centre and about how budget cuts impede Ireland's national art form: literature.
or hiding behind the ESC key:
“I can look at it from my (apartment) window and it makes me want to go down there,” Silva said. Still, among the kids who wander in he did not expect to see her.
In other words, how can anyone really be pro-life if they don’t also extend that argument to plants. And if they don’t extend that pro-life argument to plants, then how can they really be pro-life? And if they don’t extend that pro-life argument to plants, then they are hypocrites. And if they are hypocrites, then it gives justification for continuing to ridicule them and ignore them all the while unborn children are being killed in and out of the womb and the NYT is publishing absurd opinion pieces from radical, die-hard liberals disguised as satire. The NYT, not one liberal, thinks of an unborn child as a human being, so why would any of them ever think “a being capable of processing, remembering and sharing information — a being with potentialities proper to it and inhabiting a world of its own” would “conjure” a fetus? But of course they would “conjure up a plant”, in a futile attempt to be absurd and to show how “absurd” the pro-life movement is, and is being, trying to protect unborn children, even though they neither believe a plant feels and reacts to its environment in the same way, or is remotely similar to, a fetus in any sense of the definition any more than they want to believe a fetus feels anything in its enclosed water-filled environment during its nine months of development and growth. Because if a fetus can feel, then it can certainly feel pain as it is being ripped in, and to, pieces by an abortionist. And if a fetus can feel, and feel pain, how can it do that if it is not conscious? And if a fetus is conscious is it not alive? The NYT has, suspiciously, not yet demanded the passage of legislation that grants “planthood” status to peas and other fruits and vegetables, whatever life-bearing seeds, they think ought to be protected from being slaughtered in or out of its root, vine, stalk, etc. Perhaps not everyone at the very liberal NYT is yet convinced that peas ought to be granted “planthood” status. If they need more proof to show how “human-like” peas are, perhaps they ought to employ sonograms on pea plants. But if they do, would they know not to “rape” the plant using the “trans-carpel” type of ultrasound?
“Yesterday, I go to _____.” Most students can successfully complete an irregular verb chart with “go, went, gone,” but in speech, these rules are often forgotten. Yesterday, you went; you didn’t go.
Two men walk through the Greenwich Village of the late ’50s/early ’60s:
Time for that quote: Sue Arnold writes:
Still feeling that her chances of success were better in the U.S., Reddy undertook a performing career. For the better part of five years she eked out a modest living. She met her second husband, agent Jeff Wald, at a party friends were throwing to help raise money for her rent. They moved to Los Angeles where Wald found initial success managing other acts. When Helen insisted he turn his energies back to her career, he went at it full force and eventually landed her a contract with Capitol Records, where she would stay for the most successful run of her career.
Member of the City Council
3. Ghostfunk - Make It N.Y.
Let make our love a miracle/ a great great love.
Salt-strewn sidewalks and the stomping of a million feet turn pristine powder into putty-coloured slush, at street corners the slush becomes wading shallows, and the rest hardens into hazardous slippery ice. Then there are the dirty shovelled banks.
I have my doubts about just how democratic the process is anymore (a discussion for another post, maybe), but nonetheless that feeling is dwarfed by the sense of importance attached to voting itself. It's a hard-fought-for right, after all, and we're seeing enough of those being eroded (legal aid for those on welfare benefits; a health service free at the point of use thanks to NI contributions, etc) by the smash-and-grab tactics of the coalition government.
This book by the late Peter Maas describes the rise and fall of Edwin Wilson, a covert officer who went from co-ordinating the supply of weapons, surveillance systems, oil, anything to regimes friendly to the US, to a life outside the agency providing over fifty thousand pounds of explosives to Libyan dictator Muammar Qaddafi, as well as arranging for the training of a paramilitary squad, and the assassination of overseas enemies of the Libyan regime. Wilson, as well as a few conspiracy theorists, have insisted that he was only taking orders for his work. There is little evidence in support, and a great deal in refutation of this, the theory only having credence because so much spywork remains shadowy and undocumented, allowing any and all hypotheses to flourish. One point of refutation unfortunately lacking is that the Libyan state at the time was beyond the pale, since other, more heinous leaders, such as Iran’s Reza Shah, were happily supplied while Wilson was at CIA; only that Libya’s interests were not congruent with that of the US at that time.
On January 7th, 2012, the 69th anniversary of the loss of the Brilliant scientist Nikola Tesla, we will DEMAND that we stop being lied to., we will stand together and demand his research into harnessing electricity from the ionosphere, at a facility called Wardenclyffe, be released to the public.
You could still easily walk past this rather unsuspecting cafe on the George IV bridge in Edinburgh – except that you are now hindered in your journey by those wishing to have their photographs taken outside…………
I met a girl in class who carries a Baby, the Stars Shine Bright tote. I think this is the San Francisco Limited Edition too. It's a perfect size to put papers, laptop, or books in--just so convenient. Usakyuma is also just as cute and she keeps Heizo company in class.
Xe-Services, Afghan drug barons, RAW join hands to protect TTP militants
But call the cops she did. And when they got there, they charged the dad with two counts of child endangerment. Meantime, of course, child protective services is investigating, too. Because any time you trust your children or your community, YOU cannot be trusted.
Elliott Samuel
She also likes awards, so I made her one…
As Bobby was rounding the curve on Haley Road, he turned off his headlights, and he shut down the engine. Coasting quietly into the driveway, Bobby was angry and emotionally distraught. He could hardly contain himself. He reached into the back of his truck and got his revolver. Trying to be as quiet as possible, Bobby slowly walked up the steps, onto the porch, and peeked into the bedroom window. There they were, going at it like two dogs in heat. Bobby was in an uncontrollable rage. The house was very old. And Bobby, being as mad as he was, forgot the creaking sound the pine boards on the porch floor made when walking to the front door.
September brings on a new season; but it still keeps my mind refreshed and ready for each day. But knowing that November is around the corner and that hollow feeling of it is close by is sending me into an emotionally needy frenzy. Oh, how I wish that I could just wake up and feel as if every worry thought and notion was gone. Any feeling of doubt that each day will not end with relief...as if waking up from the best sleep you have ever enjoyed...With a new year ahead of us and a desire to renew myself I am sure that it will pass bye without too much pain.
Goodreads Summary: Weird as it is working for the International Paranormal Containment Agency, Evie’s always thought of herself as normal. Sure, her best friend is a mermaid, her ex-boyfriend is a faerie, she’s falling for a shape-shifter, and she’s the only person who can see through paranormals’ glamours, but still. Normal.
But I can’t help myself
Thanks for reading and if you could pop up a prayer for us, I'd appreciate it. :)
We need to keep up the pressure, because pressure works. Recently thousands of people emailed the company to complain about it promoting its formula with the claim it is "The new 'Gold Standard' in infant nutrition". As a result, Nestlé discontinued the leaflet with this claim. However, it is refusing to stop the majority (97%) of the violations in the last global monitoring report.
I don't feel deprived of anything which is why I believe this will work long term. And the buzz I had after running 25 minutes non stop Thursday morning is making me get up and do it all again at 6:30am tomorrow!!
I thought I would share a picture of the new family
Week 8: Sunday, Oct. 28, at Detroit, 10:00 AM
It’s a truism but it’s a truism for a reason. Imagine pushing a rock down a hill. The hardest part is getting it going. It may take you many minutes to get it to move at all, but once its going it builds momentum getting faster and faster, until it reaches the end of the journey. If you ran ahead and tried to stop it from moving what do you think would happen? It would crush you. It is going to reach the end at that point whether you move out of the way or not.
Today, the mechanic comes into the waiting room and tells me that my Wiznut Gasket access door is missing. He asks if I want it replaced. A tiny little trickle of logical thought wanders into my mind and a little voice (voice of Clint Eastwood from the Dirty Harry movies…) whispers to me that there is no way that someone would actually call an actual automotive device a WIZNUT anything……
Well, you’re ahead of me by now as I head to the bathroom. My scales have been giving me bad news for a couple of months, as often happens toward the end of winter and into early spring. Standing on the scales Monday, I realized I was looking at my so-called “real” weight, but calculating my “true” weight. This which involved a series of adjustments based on the number of articles of clothing I was wearing (subtract one pound per article – that’s fair, right?), time of day, nearness to last meal, and size of last meal (and nearness and size allow for a third adjustment based on amount of food yet unprocessed – I shouldn’t be held accountable for food that isn’t me yet, right?). After making these simple and obviously valid adjustments, my “real” weight, which might end with a 7, becomes a “true” weight ending in 2 or even a 0. Great, huh?
I'm sitting in our living-room in Holland now. The doorwindows that lead to the back-yard are wide open and from here I can smell the aroma of the spring and see how the sun caresses our plants in the garden.
She and I both have bulging lumbar discs
5, Rue Daunou
* This article encouraging home inspectors to tread softly on the language is generating quite a bit of buzz. What’s your take?
It was really a beautiful day - not too hot, with a nice breeze, and it was great to be out on the water. We sailed into the harbor and on several canals (I hadn't realized before this that Copenhagen has canals), passing lots of other tourist boats doing the same thing.
Yes of course it is possible to make converged PC/tablet devices; indeed some companies are already doing so (defensively as Tim Cook characterised it). And a relative few people will be attracted to such devices and will buy them. But the mainstream majority will evaluate the converged experience and see so many compromises that it is obviously worse than the experience of either individual device.
Segal discovered that just imagining the familiar characters and some brand new ones in today's headline-worthy situations sparked a thousand ideas and jokes, inspired by the same savvy humor that made the series--the brainchild of comedy mavericks Mel Brooks and Buck Henry--so memorable.
b : sincerity in action, character, and utterance
The Fragonard Perfumes from Bea are long sought after by me and she knows just what to get for me and actually finds them....how does she know ?
I can't BELIEVE January is almost over. Then again, I missed December entirely, so I don't know why I should be surprised.
Occasionally, apps won’t play nice together. If they are sitting on your phone turned on only when you need them, this isn’t an issue, but when they are TSR (Terminate and Stay Resident) living in the background or foreground together, they can be worse than siblings in the back seat.
We left Louisville on Sunday morning. We had already planned to come home on Sunday anyway. We did laundry, repacked, and Monday (less than 24 hours after returning home) we left for Kevin’s parents after my eye appointment. Monday we also learned that the tumor was cancerous.
When I was growing up, every December, we would go to Holiday Fair, in Greenville, SC. In “those days”, the art and handiwork that was on sale was still mostly handmade, though nowadays, this particular show was given in to goods that are cheap and sometimes mass-produced. Hence, we tend to go there to stock up on Southern Supreme fruitcake, because they always have a booth, but not so much for the crafts, anymore.
The problem with a magazine staffing only "their kind" is that only the viewpoint shared by this elitist group makes it into the editorial content. This isn't limited to their narrow sense of fashion and taste but also how they view the world at large. It may well be naïvety rather than malice behind such editorial gaffes but the message that is received is nonetheless very offensive.
Just before the announcement at 9 am, Bush Sr. ordered the demolition of World Trade Center to stop the international banking computers on floors one and two, in the North Tower from initiating the new U.S. Treasury Bank system. Explosives in the World Trade Center were planted by both CIA and Mossad operatives and detonated remotely in Building 7 which was demolished later that day in order to cover-up their crime.
B- An actor in that class will take 150% of the normal damage when attacked with the selected element.
34. Visit a flea market
Meanwhile, it may be mentioned here that the Bhopal survivor organisations had termed IOA and the Government of India’s opposition to Dow’s involvement in the London Olympics as “insincere”. They had said that both should stop “shedding crocodile tears” and take real action on conveying India’s displeasure to IOC. The organisations pointed to instances where Dow had managed to jockey itself into associations with the IOA and the Government of India. Dow’s website claims it supplied insulation material through the IOA to the Commonwealth Games 2010. (pervezbari@eth.net)
“This is no longer arguable,” said Dr. Byron Lee, a cardiologist and director of the electrophysiology laboratory at the University of California, San Francisco. “This is a scientific fact. The national debate should now center on whether the risk of sudden death with Tasers is low enough to warrant widespread use by law enforcement.”
Business Guru. Former Head of ICI
Sometimes...all you need is just a box of sunshine...!!!
Once there was an old lady who was very much famed for her cooking. Her family, friends, neighbors, everyone used to love her cooking. She liked cooking as much as she liked feeding others. Hence there were frequent parties at her home. She knew by heart who liked what to eat and cooked their favorite meals. Her culinary power was something of a legend.
I took her cue, pushing one chair across the carpet so it was by the sliding glass door leading to the balcony. I didn’t settle in right away. First, I exercised my power.
14709 US Hwy 31 North
*****In compliance with FTC guidelines, I'm disclosing that I received this book for free through GoodReads First Reads. ****
Last week, we asked folks to leave us two lies and one truth, and we did the same. Time now for us to reveal our answers.
16 Fall In Love With Me
Here's what it looked like:
Disclaimer: I did not receive any compensation for this giveaway or review of product - this is just me trying to boost my blog by giving away free stuff! If you have a product you would like me to review and/or have items to giveaway, I am more than happy to discuss with you - please contact me by email
The presenters welcome suggestions/questions from potential listeners on any specific topic that they wish addressed at the presentation. Please email suggestions/questions to ciyer@sughrue.com.
On the first Tuesday in August next. Will be sold before the Court House door in the town of Troupville, Lowndes county, between the usual hours of sale, the following property to wit:
The personal part is much more difficult. In my mind, saying that you remind yourself of Malfurion Stormrage is kind of silly. I mean, have YOU ever fight back against an evil firelord in his own realm? No? Then it’s an awfully difficult comparison. I guess I identify the most with Lord Grayson Shadowbreaker. He served with distinction in the Second and Third Wars, and now is the commanding officer of the paladins of Stormwind. He is also the lead paladin trainer, charged with teaching and preparing young paladins to serve the Alliance. In real life I am a teacher and coach. I once experienced and participated in these activities, and now I am responsible for passing that learning on to a new generation of students and athletes. Although in one respect we are quite different. He is far more patient than I am, especially considering how many times I’ve gone back to him to work on my talents. He’s rather understanding that way.
I know what he's doing though.
Cyberquilters (yahoo groups) is having a twister weekend the weekend of 5/18. I just got my ruler yesterday. I tried to wait, I kept telling myself but there's binding that's needed for the birthday girl's quilt. But nope I just couldn't convince my self and tried a tiny little project first. I mean really if the ruler that I chose was going to work for me, then I'd be really frustrated the twisting weekend and no one wants that :) I just chose 9 charms and a 3 inch border all the way around. and it worked like a magic!! I wanted to see how directional prints worked cuz I just wasn't getting the whole twisting thing visually, had to do it myself. After cutting the block size was 3.5 in. One more row and you'd have a nice placemat size. I think I'll be doing a table runner for the twisting weekend.
This one is a recent discovery for us and one that’s been used over and over again. The best part is that it’s free and works well on the iPad, iPhone, and the iPod touch. BrainPop features a different educational movie each day. The videos are simple and feature the same two characters each time, but delve into lots of interesting topics. We’ve learned about hurricanes, Mars, Jane Goodall, The Civil War, Wind Energy, Nutrition, Cameras, and so much more. Alex can hardly wait to see what her next movie will be and we’ve had so many interesting conversations as a result. She loves it so much that she was really concerned when we went camping. “But mom,” she complained, “I’m not going to be able to upload my BrainPop movie without the Internet!”
I hope you enjoyed your visit today.
Pardon the course language. Sometimes only one term actually fits.
How our aching hearts despair!
We listened to the chancellor of the exchequer Budget speech and whilst we welcome measures to reduce tax and to encourage growth, it is not enough. The Budget today was all cockle-a-doo-doo nonsense. Just nothing more than a small sticky plaster over the devestating financial problems that this country faces. The Budget today was typical give with one hand, take with the other hand. The poor got poorer and the rich got richer under the Budget today.
Sometimes you have to stray from your path to truly appreciate it. I’ve learned not to be afraid of change and taking risks. We all have talents and passions. In many cases, those talents and passions are very marketable. Is life perfect? No… is anyone’s? What is perfect anyway? As I write this, I’m nursing two sick kids back to health, with the dissertation on hold for a day or two until they get back to school.
Don't forget to visit my lovely Ribbon Reel team-mates and leave them some love too! All the info you need to join us for the Spring/Easter themed challenge is right HERE.
Have you organized your home office recently? Do you have stacks of papers piling up around you? Not sure where to find your latest Elle Décor? If you answered yes, to any of these questions it’s time to organize your home office. Here are five steps to make your office space functional and beautiful.
4. Sieve in the flour and baking powder and fold in – don’t beat!
Second, I need to focus on the things that matter most. Winter camp is a big annual event. I should’ve been better prepared for it and not spread myself so thin the rest of the week.
Perce and the atheist sponsors of the billboard said they are dismayed that people were offended by the image instead of what he called injustices in the Bible and legislators naming 2012 “The Year of the Bible.”
Last Thursday, I went to see Bruno at the Cineworld in Trocadero with my sister-friend who I've known since uni (but feels like forever). The film is funny in parts but its disgusting elements outweigh the comedy for me. I much preferred Borat as it was new and different. Bruno seemed very much similar in plot and structure. Disgraced foreign TV personality seeks new life in America, accompanied by trusty sidekick who he later falls out with AND is reunited with. Nonetheless, it was nice to catch up with T and have a laugh. She is also an LPC student and just got awarded a Distinction! Woot!
Well, things changed today.
The music from the original series if full of reminders from my childhood. From this cue (in “An Imposter”) I particularly remember the rhythmic percussion. It seemed to be used quite frequently, particularly when the crew were in some sort of peril.
I often say that entertaining is the best motivation for decorating and that's definitely what happened with our dining room. We were hosting a New Year's Eve dinner at our house last year and were looking for a more formal option than having all our guests sit down at the breakfast nook. So we moved the farmhouse table into the dining room and converted the breakfast nook into a Starbucks-esque lounge nook with 2 big arm chairs. It is perfect for reading the morning paper or enjoying our breakfast.
Photo credits (Flickr): liber, d3 Dan
5. Simmer lentils to thicken sauce (the mixture shouldn’t be soupy). Saute 2 cups diced carrots with 2 diced garlic cloves in a little oil for 3 to 4 minutes. Add 2 cups of frozen peas and heat through. (If using frozen carrots as well, just heat both vegetables together with oil and garlic.)
powder sugar
In the aftermath of the genocide, many women who had been imprisoned in rape camps were not only traumatised they were stigmatised because they had HIV and babies as a result of their rapes. But they overcame even these obstacles because, as one woman describes it, “Since all of us had suffered from this, we were able to support each other. That is what saved us.” . . .(1)
18) Do you have even the slightest idea of how beautiful you are? +
Sayonara, credit cad. Yeah, you read that right: credit cad. I had no idea until today how much power you had over me. Because you were my first and only cad, I didn’t want to cut off contact with you, even after I’d cut up that momento you’d given me. (Pure plastic–I should’ve known how cheap you were, under all that swagger!)
The aperture ring offers 3 different graphics. I assume this was done to make it completely obvious for everyone using it. The right side offers apertures of 11, 16 and 22. The top is a visual representation of the aperture opening, from wide to small. The left side offers sunlight variations.
An oligarchy is a government where those with the most money have an incredible amount of influence on public policy as opposed to the people with normal amounts of money relative to that society have very little influence on public policy.
There is no definitive proof of dirty hair was more susceptible to aphids that hair clean. This will kill the lice, so they will not stay on point and jump rear into your childs head. It has three steps, namely, nits, larvae and adult lice. Although we usually think to see the symptoms of lice infestation is an itchy head, in fact, if you are allergic to the saliva lice, you most likely will not get itchy This is similar to cat allergy -. If you are a teacher in a preschool or elementary classes, youve most likely come across head lice at numerous of your students from time to time. People heard concerning treatments for head lice mayonnaise for the first time may find incredible, and may be willing to try.
(If you donated already to Kareen or Olga, your comments of course still count as entries in the giveaway)
So, is this sugar cane based paper as sweet as everyone at FPN says it is? For me, the answer is no, but it has more to do with the paper's feel rather than its performance. In fact, other than the feel of the paper, I like everything about this notebook quite a bit.
Propelled me forth
Customer reviews of King Controls KD-2200 King-Dome 18″ White Stationary Automatic Satellite System with Built-in Digital Off-Air Antenna are available from the merchant’s website, see it by visit the link below.
1 linings
Ethan: Nooooo.....
The translation of this volume by Philip Gabriel demonstrated a natural and idiomatic grasp of Murakami's words. It was a good thing that Murakami had this time allowed his work to be edited and tightened for coherence and unity. The possibility of a sequel should not be discounted. Murakami, the perceiver, had the luxury to listen to the voice and transmit its imagined reality to us receivers. It was not hard to lose oneself in this underground reality. What was hard was to snap out of it.
"We have four beautiful women and a munchkin!" - Random carni at the Haunted Circus... The munchkin was Nicole.
We do also need Squares for 'One Heart From Around The World' but if you would like to make a Heart Square of your own choice then please do so.
Best Catered Baker's Choice - The Cupcake Bar - Tres Leches with Whipped Cream Icing and topped with Toasted Coconut
Will blow her ships up in the air
The person would then be stabbed. After the murders, some of the victims were further disfigured by having their faces driven over by a car so that police could not compare their faces with photos in false identity documents that the alleged murderers had obtained beforehand.
Do you have any tips, suggestions, and/or blackmail-quality karaoke videos? Get in on the action by following @stella_meimei on Twitter, or leave a comment below!
Readers Annotation: Frankie Landau-Banks, at age 16: Possibly a criminal mastermind. This is the story of how she got that way.
and torn almost in two
I experienced this sense of déjà vu recently, with a fruit that was entirely new to me.
Later, Pavarti went to work in the finance industry as a freelance accountant for several international law firms. She now operates her own accounting firm in the Washington DC area, where she lives with her husband, two daughters and two terrible dogs. When not preparing taxes, she is busy penning her next novel.
the original pottersblog lasted 2 years and one month and then I opened this one. This blog is 11 months old, and running out of memory :)
I did NOT have kids to FARM THEM OUT!!!!!! Hello!!!! He is a PS teacher if that helps.
That last statement warrants explanation because it gives insight into 2 other characteristics of this blog. When many people refer to The English Canon, they consider only those works that were originally written in English. Although this would technically be correct according to academia, we are going to thumb our collective noses at the towering beast of English academia and will allow for discussion on this blog only the following things……wait for it…anything that can be read by somebody who understands English. This will of course rule out most of the billboards in Miami…it’s OK I can say that I’m from there :-/ please don’t leave because of that!
There are so many exciting things happening in my life right now that I can't wait to share, but for now I'll have to leave you with an extreme cuteness overload for your weekend.
Oh yeah, we are motoring along with this challenge. I am finding it pretty easy this time and more fun. I think if I think of it more like a game than a chore, then it's easier.
PILM: What do you think it takes for that to happen, for that big break, get heard above the noise?
Talking at the departure gate, the boys’ old-style People’s Liberation Army winter hats (the current weird China-tourist-souvenir fad) spur him to recall that those were the hats they wore when he was 11 in 1966, the year the Cultural Revolution began. (I feel vaguely panicked at the semiotics, the potential ideological echo, the kids may be broadcasting wearing these hats.)
Act 2: Balmorra – Republic Level 32-36 – Empire Level 16-20
HENRY JAGLOM: Orson sat me down at lunch one day. I was upset cause I was running out of time and money on a film. He looked at me and said, 'The enemy of art is the absence of limitations.' Which means, if you have all the time and money in the world, you're gonna create something that's limited. But if you're forced to create while looking for solutions you'll break through those limitations. And from that day on, that ideal has been my mantra.
Hemp bills have been introduced in 11 state legislatures this year, but so far none have passed, according to the National Conference of State Legislatures. The bills include allowing privately funded industrial hemp research, allowing hemp production under strict licensing programs and urging the federal government to allow hemp production for industrial uses.
Then we have Christmas morning breakfast... I prepare it the night before (keeps me busy while we await the late late late night tree and stocking filling) I made HOMEMADE Cinnamon Rolls this year from Pioneer Woman.... one word- AMAZING.
1 tsp chile powder
That was Wednesday. After a good night's sleep and a good breakfast, we spent Thursday in nearby Culemborg, Wijk bij Duurstede, and Buren, all cities we've visited and wanted them to see.
8. Challenges. In anything that is worth doing there is an element of challenge, obstacles to be overcome or avoided, new skills and techniques to learn etc. We all have limitations, skills we don’t have and maybe never will. We all have personality traits that, at times, can be highly damaging to creativity, not to mention our relationships. And sometimes we need to be willing to learn from others who have negotiated the challenges before us, to accept the help of those around us, to accept that we cannot do this alone.
Recently I have had some very disturbing information come across my desk. It has to do with the so-called breeding program that Dr. Jacobs and others in the UFO community have researched. A brief thumbnail sketch for those of you who don’t know what I’m talking about. We are told in the Guidebook to the Supernatural i.e. the Bible that it will be like the days of Noah when the son of man returns. This begs the question what differentiates those days from any other. In my opinion it is the presence of the fallen angels once again manifesting openly on the planet. The so-called alien/human hybrid is a modern-day equivalent of what happened thousands of years ago in antiquity. In other words the Nephilim are back. The picture that I displayed to the left may be the real thing, a hybrid, in as far as what some abductees report seeing. According to Dr. Jacobs the breeding program has reached its conclusion and unlike the picture above the results are such that these demonic hybrids can pass as human. Now back to what came across my desk. This person related that the sons of god i.e. the fallen angels are engaged in a breeding program as they:
This was my first encounter with the Kingdom of God, the presence of the actual reign (rule) of God. Jesus had said that the Kingdom of God was at hand (close) but I had never before been aware of God’s government. But I was that night — my heart shuddered. I was so overcome with awe at what I was encountering that I did something I had never done before. I began to talk to God out loud in front of people. The word’s flowed from deep within me.
After all, who do you know better than yourself?
About 75% have visited a Web site bashing another student.
He was leaving at noon the next day, and we stayed in bed all morning. I remember him giving me so many orgasms that I said to him, “OMG – I don’t want to wash the sheets because I can smell you and I all over them!” We just laughed. And, of course I washed them as I always do, but this particular afternoon, when he was gone, I pulled the sheets off of the bed and held them in my hands, up to my nose and just breathed the essence of him in. I stood there for about a good five minutes just breathing in those sheets and reminiscing on our time together that weekend. And just a few weeks later he wrote something to me that when I read it now, I know that in that time, he was right: we had a very strong, very powerful kind of love. He told me back then that for the rest of his life, when he thinks of me, it would always be with powerful feelings of love, and even if what he said wasn’t true, I think the love I felt for him was enough to cover us both (smile).
Of his fairy figurines.
“Even big collections of ordinary books distort space and time, as can readily be proved by anyone who has been around a really old-fashioned second-hand bookshop, one of those that has more staircases than storeys and those rows of shelves that end in little doors that are surely too small for a full sized human to enter.
This colour in this owl button work so well with the Kaisercraft papers, I think he is cute.
My wife asks why I read such a potentially depressing book. Granted, I do get enjoyment from the action and adventure but I also do it in order to appreciate my own life. Viewing my own relationships through the broken glass of Jonah’s life, I appreciate what I have, but I am also inspired to work to make mine better. So much of Jonah’s life has been spent turning his back on his pain and those who abandoned him that it spurs me on to take action, to make the phone call, to reach out, to connect with my family so that there will never be
"It did the same thing when it lost control of the City of Cape Town in 2006," she wrote in her weekly newsletter as leader of the Democratic Alliance.
so get a head start on your holiday feast by placing an order for one of our delicious pies today!
Greece
Step 5: Repeat these steps until the whole lantern is covered. Once finished, attached some fabric to the metal frame of the lantern to hang.
- loving the fact that after every practice or game, the boys get a free treat as they leave the locker rooms. I suppose this is from one of the many club sponsors. Danika usually manages to “cute” her way into getting one too.
There are a few tools you’ll need, depending on your knobs. I needed a pencil, hammer, chisel, Phillips screwdriver and a drill (last two not pictured):
This year I've really enjoyed watching the friendships grow.
I characterized my problem as a “Clark Kent and Superman” problem … I see people applying the scientific method to figuring out what’s going on with the climate, and I’m seeing prognostications of doom. But the scientific method and the doomsaying are never in the same room at the same time.
This morning Advocate General Bot delivered his Opinion in the UsedSoft" dispute, Case C‑128/11 Axel W. Bierbach v Oracle International Corp. In this reference to the Court of Justice of the European Union (CJEU), the court was asked by the German Bundergerichtshof to rule on the following questions:
What’s better than this star power? The film is directed by the great, Joss Whedon (Buffy the Vampire Slayer, Angel, Firefly, and Dollhouse TV series).
How on earth can October almost be over? Time has been just flying by. It seems that just doing the regular day to day things have taken so much time that I have little time left for blogging. Every so often I get a chance to visit a blog or two, but not as many as I'd like. When I realized that the month is almost over I couldn't believe it. We've had mostly beautiful fall weather and every chance I get I run out to do a little cleaning up or planting. Yesterday the Littlest Gardener and I spent a couple of hours cleaning up the front raised beds, emptying containers, cutting things back and even planted a few bulbs. I just never know when the last of the sun will be and want to soak in every ray I can!
‘What?’ Jessamine replied, her stern voice giving way to wavering uncertainty. ‘When? How?’
He felt like a fool. He felt he had let his hopes up and for no reason. “It’s me. Your son.”
I wrote about this in my song “Precious” after an awakening experience I had when I lived for a year in India. (You can take a listen, if you feel so moved, through the audio player on my website: http://www.parvatimusic.com/media/audio/). I realized “As I love myself, I love all things equally”. The only reality is love and love is all things. There is no separation. There is only a continuum of love that expands through all time and space. That is reality. A person resonant in the Positive Possibilities lives these truths moment to moment and understands that to do that which is respectful and loving to oneself is good for all. The Positive Possibilities is a connected and interconnected state of being.
Check out some fantastic displays built by Mr. Freely!
We are lucky enough to be sponsored by the fabulous
“We had possession in the second half, and we did the things we wanted to do,” Gonzalez said. “We were able to create things and play a little wider, and we got the win.”
It is just my opinion, but I believe the present “war on global terrorism” will best be fought covertly with a well-funded, covert intelligence and a counter-terrorism program, not by a massed army followed by a decade of “nation building.”
07. Echoes
Girl you make my heart beat frantic,
Yippppee!!
I won't go into detail, but there was a project my husband and I have been discussing that was about to come into fruition.
Moments later, it occurs to me: "I could buy a bell." Epiphany strikes just as I am crossing the doorstep of Atelier Go Sport, a bike repair shop along avenue Richard-Lenoir.
AcuGraph Forum: Connect and share with other AcuGraph users. Search for problems, solutions, hints and ideas that other practitioners have experienced.
The Hurlock Community Center (The Old Train Station)
89. The Handcuffs-Waiting For The Robot (OOFL)
I was driving to the supermarket in the rain. The CD player had come on, and was at no. 14 of Bach’s Goldberg Variations, by the pianist Glenn Gould. It was the 1981 re-recording as opposed to his debut album in 1955 playing the same 31 pieces. This later version stands out for the dramatic variety of its tempi and its ultra-high fidelity: sufficient to capture his soft sing-along accompaniment (“groaning and crooning”), if you listen carefully.
In a third incident, JFK slept with a member of a freelance booty spy ring who was selling information on a “piece work basis” to Russia and its Warsaw Pact allies.
Dr. WayTooThoroughAndLingeringWithTheFingering seemed to take a left turn and I thought okay, this totally bites, but it’s almost over. Suddenly Dr. SeemsToBeEnjoyingHer/Himself dove in deep and in the center. I literally gulped and said something but I can’t remember what. I think it was, “Whoa-ho uh excuse me,” or “What the fuh,” or some sort of quiet whimpering. I have never engaged in the receiving end of ass-play during sex and I can now confirm it is NOT going to become part of the package in the future. No thank you, do not pass go, do not collect $200 and do NOT stick your finger up my a-hole!!!!!
- Shammy 5/2/12 7:08am
The movie star, 24 year old vegan for 21 years, is doing a veggie spot for PETA, vegan
#41. triple play thursdays on 100.3 The Sound LA
“As soon as we secured services with Brent and Jillian, we went right to work on getting to know their personality, their story, their interests, style, and taste,” says Matt Brys from Extreme Productions. “From there, we were able to build out the ‘experience’ of the day (the music, energy, MC work, lighting, production, announcements, etc… and we added in extra flair with lighting and confetti cannons for that WOW factor!”
Do you like them? I made them myself out of a type of drying doll making stone clay. I rolled out the dough and then texturized and painted them myself! YAY~ Yay for Easter Stuff.
So, with my sisters' help I painted about 40 or so wine glasses...all different. It seemed to be a big hit and the guests each brought them home.
And a new challenger has emerged for the last position-- Justin Ross' Indiana Hoosiers! They are in sole possession of the last spot in this week's Gus rankings, securing -6 points for themselves thus far. Then again, losing to Ball State, North Texas and Virginia will do that to a team.
I suppose this trend isn’t unique to science fiction – most stories in any genre end happily somehow. They might be troubled victories, but the protagonist seldom loses, seldom sees his plans thwarted, seldom finds his efforts futile. I guess, on some level, we all like to think that the happy ending is out there for all of us, no matter how terrible things look. Alien brain slugs might be eating our neighbors, but we, dammit, are going to find a way to survive.
We came back to North America after a total of 2 1/2 years in Korea. Kyle proposed to me two weeks after we got back to Toronto, on his birthday, in the neighborhood I grew up in. He sent me on a scavenger hunt to all the places that had meant something to me. My elementary school, my high school, the local little corner store where I used to spend every bit of allowance, my old house, which I hadn't been back to since my dad sold it while I was in Korea. Kyle was waiting at the end, with a ring and a promise.
6. I get lazy with potty training.My son is almost 3 but I feel like he should have been doing his business in the toilet long ago.We could have started sooner than we did, although it may not have worked.But sometimes, I just didn’t have the energy, nor patience to sit him on the potty every hour ALL DAY. FYI…he is almost trained but that came with a lot of rewards, and hooting and hollering.Geesh, you’d think that his little league team had just won the championship game with how loud with squealed with delight when we saw the big turd in the toilet!
Clifford Crane knows that the Apollo vision is designed in such a way that it allows the system to track certain events automatically with a manual camera control. This makes it easy for the system to send recordings and emails automatically to the system administrator, streamlining the recordings and reducing the burden of constantly checking in on the system.
The tickets available on StubHub were prohibitive by cost and/or seat location. We moved on.
Memorial Day, the rose in the picture above, is a beautiful, fragrant, pink rose. It usually blooms for the first time around Memorial Day, which I assume helped contribute to its name.
Why not give it a try yourself?
I gave myself a lot of quality time. I worked out, learned badminton, and lost about 50 pounds. I worked at just feeling better about myself and I did. Losing weight was a huge confidence booster, and that helped restore my self-esteem. Around May to June, I picked a small job helping my aunt in this events management business she had starting. That stint gave me some string to dangle on since I was literally flat broke.
819 D-X/23(A)/1981. “A Comparison of New Rightists and Socialists.” Annual Meeting, Illinois Political Science Association, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago Illinois.
Click below to download the complete set of prompts of ideas so far
Do you have preparations for an extended electrical outage?
An accidental conversation was the spark for a solid business partnership and a May 12 charity golf fundraiser between the West Broward Bar Association (WBBA) and Seminole Middle School in Plantation.
A woman’s work is never done.
* 10 tons of sleeping bags, sweatsuits, gloves picked up
4 integration
The problem is not in the hours themselves but in our toxic drinking culture that perversely stigmatises moderate drinking while celebrating gross excess. It is no longer, as it once was, seen as a point of pride to be able to “hold your drink”. Maybe the answer is for the police to make more use of the powers they already have to bang people up in the cells overnight for being drunk and disorderly. Once the word got around, that would send a salutary message to weekend revellers to keep their drinking under control.
Some type of fill has been added here; I thought the CCC did it, but it may be a later addition:
Living in the city has made me retool a lot of my thinking in a way that I'm happy to have brought to my attention.
The trophy that champions of the Isthmian Games received was a wreath composed of woven branches. Eventually, the crown would decompose and the competitor would have nothing to show for their efforts. Paul here reminds us that the wreath Christians can look forward to will never fade away. This is all the more reason to put forth our best efforts to receive this reward.
I support free speech, no matter how vigorously I disagree with the ideas of the person speaking, because I believe the truth has a special weight all of its own. It always comes out, it generally prevails, unless drastic steps are taken to suppress it. Logical, rational people are drawn to it, like moths to a flame, and why shouldn't they be?
We respect Nigeria’s sovereign right to conduct her own internal affairs, however; we see the wisdom of supporting decisive action. We believe that developing a comprehensive strategy of rooting out corruption at the highest levels of the Nigerian government, implementing economic development plans for your northern citizens, respecting the rule of law, and formulating counterterrorism measures that compliment the increase in security funding, would be excellent steps to address the insurgency.
1 Tbsp. brown sugar
A checking account designed for businesses helps you keep track of your business’s financial activity separately from your personal finances. Use your business checking account for all your business purchases. This makes it easier to track your company’s transactions. Also, you should only use a credit card that is designated for the business to order supplies or conduct other business transactions.
When I look at a bag, I look inside and look to see how many compartments there is. The reason that I do this is because I am someone who likes compartments inside a bag so that everything that lives or goes in my purse has a home.
A little over a decade ago, once I came to the conclusion that the Christian version or any of the other hundreds of different religion's idea of "GOD" was not my belief I began to sit back and try and figure out Who I was, Why I'm here...and my belief of Who/What I thought "GOD" is...or if I even believed there is the widely accepted fictional character sitting high in the clouds dangling the unknown appearance of a "savior" over your head at all. Just writing down those words make it sound all the more ridiculous...
My little neighbour who was transferred to the nursing home on Monday was rushed to hospital yesterday morning with a suspected heart attack. I am her 'next of kin' although not actually related. She is just a good neighbour and a friend of over 21 years. Twiglet came to the hospital with me and we sat in A & E for over 4 hours before she was admitted to the ward. Bless her she is confused and of course found it all rather frightening....so I was made well aware of why I still have an empty 'to do' rail.....She needed me :-)
The Japanese term “gendai” simply means “modern,” but in the context of haiku it seems to carry the connotation of something more like “avant-garde” or “experimental” in English. Scott Metz, who is a pretty avant-garde American haiku poet himself, explains its origins on his blog “lakes and now wolves”:
might be almost enough to keep them back.
Thus the article doesn't squarely address the question posed by Assemblyman Jim Brennan, who sued to get the documents he passed on to the Times, asking "whether the Project’s size and density could be reduced without endangering its economic viability.” Instead, it leaves the impression that Forest City Ratner needs as long a leash as possible, even though it has essentially received a private rezoning for prime property.
Of course, all of our natural lip colours are different and this does effect the way the colour looks on each of us.
Here is my second "Masculine" themed project for Calico Crafts this month. Focusing on, not just fathers day, but all the men in our lives. Lots of people find male themed things tricky but, with Altered art, I think its much easier than with card making and scrapbooking. I actually prefer it to feminine themes.
The lamp shade is covered in the red Poka Dots fabric, which always make me think of Betty Boop and gives me a chuckle.
Of all the the translations of the Bible, the King James Version is the most popular. But all the Biblical purists who want to retain the “thee’s and thou’s” and verbs ending in “eth” should remember that Jesus didn’t speak the King’s English. Today, there are dozens of versions of the Bible. The reasons so many versions exist is because the Bible has come to be so many different things to so many different people.
This was brief overview of Johnny and Associates. This is almost like a introduction post to more detailed posts that will be coming soon about Johnnys. I hope you enjoyed this and if you have any questions about Johnnys for the next “Johnnys Talk”, please email me at nihonchique@gmail.com.
Artistic freedom as defined by the U.S. Constitution's First Amendment was on trial and freedom lost the day Morrison was sent to prison. The Morrison that appeared after his incarceration was a ghost of the youth who sang, "You can light my fire." Dispirited and in failing health due to heroin addiction, Morrison disappeared from the limelight.
This is her revenge for all the years of pain and tears
I just hope it works.
there are sooo many cute etsy shops out there with great vintage goods, and i've been looking at a lot of them lately. i have a hard time buying 'vintage' goods from shops on etsy or elsewhere (when they can be found at thrift stores by your's truly for way less!), but junk culture's prices are definitely decent, and seeing everything with that crisp white background makes me love it more! sometimes it's nice to just indulge in "easy thrifting" (aka buying off the internet :), and this is one store i'd definitely go to for just that! check out these cute finds:
At this point, I met Big Jim, the guy who would be tandem skydiving with me at 14,000 feet. When he started to suit me up, I expected some serious instructions. I wished that I had a notepad to keep track of all the life-affirming skills he was going to teach me about skydiving. (Speaking of wishes, I also wished that I’d worn pants, because wearing shorts with this skydiving gear is simply a terrible idea. I basically looked like I wasn’t wearing any shorts at all. And like most girls, I absolutely love my thighs. And showing them off to the world in their full glory. Insert sarcasm.)
One day I decided the entire lawn around my pond had to be removed and replaced with pea gravel. After assembling the materials, I asked my crew, can we do this in one day? We did and when Steve returned home he was, let's say......unhappy. His wood working studio was adjacent and he had to walk through the pea gravel to come and go. You see, this stone slows you down, forcing one to stop and smell the roses.
I went for embossing onto tissue paper, I've fancied doing this for a while, but hadn't come up with the right project. I had it in mind to make my Mom a little scrap book of some photos I took in her garden this summer. I just popped out one Sunday afternoon and took loads of photos on my phone and they came out so beautifully I wanted to give them to her. She works really hard on her garden, and it's gorgeous. So, I tried out my new technique on the cover.
mountains of paperwork,
I have also been in Doubt. That is a sad place to go, and I try not to visit there too often.
Zest the lemon and add zest, juice, vanilla, and cranberries
Row 21: Knit 2 stitches together, knit to the end of the row. (21 stitches)
Don't do this.
Middlesex University
A. 1022 Evergreen Place
Melt 4 tablespoons of real Butter in the microwave
“We are evaluating it right now. But it is a significant development to the industry,” said Mulally.
In order to ‘let’ your networks operate at maximum robustness, however, you must learn about yourself and the world and the ways in which they are interconnected. Understanding the immanent order of the world, that which gave rise to valuation, is what allows us to promote robustness. It is in this manner that network ethics proposes something quite similar to what Spinoza called the ‘intellectual love of god’ as its primary ethical goal. This goal is also quite similar to that of the ancient Stoics, a clear influence on Spinoza’s immanent ethics, as well as Nietzsche’s own attempt to create a ‘this-worldly ethics’. Linking this to genealogy is the project of metaleptics, and it is in this manner that the project of network ethics works to ground itself by valuing itself, and thereby ‘eating its own tail’, so to speak.
Once again, an unpleasant sleep gave way to an unpleasant rise. There were millions of them around this time, a sea of different shades, each walking erect and deliberate. There were small and large, black and white skinned, but wearing cloth of various colors. He stood up, aware of the surveillance of these bizarre animals, and went to relieve himself. A chatter of laughter erupted and he spun around, alert but was met with a rampage of blinding lights flashing. This is when there was a sense of danger.
It's possible to copy a spell from one wizard's book into another, but it will require a whole lot of Read Magic spells, access to expensive inks and what-not, and plenty of time — at least 1d4 days per spell level. Also, there's a small chance (actual % depending on the ratio of caster and spell level) that the process will destroy the original, like reading a spell from a scroll. Even that tiny risk, along with having to surrender control of their spellbook for so long, makes most players unwilling to freely share their spells with others. However, it does make it possible for MU characters to expand their repertoire from found/stolen material as long as they're prepared to devote the time and resources to doing so.
The book I'm reading right now is Cracked Up to Be by Courtney Summers and here are my sentences!
Causes of High Cholesterol
Yes, the wonders of modern life hey, I am blogging on route from our fabulous youth hostel in Thurlby to the Space Centre in Leicester! The sun really is gorgeous this morning, the whole of nature seems to be singing!
FYI I am wearing my Barton Creek Golf baseball cap and my beer Lao t-shirt.
“Sorry,” she barked, still in military mode. “What were you saying about MiMi?”
He places UUism squarely in the mainstream of the American religion tradition, primarily by discussing how it is principally in line with America's cultural bias of individualism.
What Nancy was trying to do was to pinpoint something like, oh, the mom put them down and it was ONLY the dad who found her missing. It turns out that the mom went to work before Isabel woke up and it was the dad who went into her room and discovered her missing around 8 AM.
and kinda lazy,
The tutorial was great! The thing I struggled with the most was uneven fabric strips so to make sure my strips were straight before I sewed them together, I pinned them loosely and then pressed them from the front to make sure I had a straight pressed seam to use as my guide. This worked very well! If I would have used the presser foot as a guide I wouldn't have had a straight line.
Now Forest City has told government officials that the high proportion of affordable apartments has made it difficult to make the economics work for the towers, despite a surprisingly strong rebound in the rental market.
I do love the snow.
Donald Americo DiTullio, 49, Peabody, Mass.
The result of this is that we have an industry without reliable principles. We have trendy "solutions" that blow with the wind. We have charlatans successfully masquerading as experts. We have a vocabulary of dreadful jargon that passes for insight. We have a class of leaders called "CMOs" who can't seem to hold a job. We have ad industry titans who have never actually practiced the art.
The XMRV virus is a retrovirus, like the HIV virus that causes AIDS. As with all viruses, a retrovirus copies its genetic code into its host, but uses RNA instead of using DNA to do so.
-twin magic
I am truly blessed to be able to podcast to the world through the internet.
Other issues cited include: the disagreement between management and rank-and-file DSNY employees regarding when to cease salting during the storm, which could have been addressed through better communication and planning, and those disagreements should be resolved before the next snow season begins. DSNY should reconsider its policy requiring that one employee stay with each and every DSNY vehicle that becomes stuck or stalled during a storm.
And I do believe that's all the links I can remember being mentioned! However, it's quite likely I forgot some. If you notice any ones mentioned in the podcast but missing here in this post, please let me know and I'll add them!
I know some people have it much worse so I am not trying to have a pity party.
According to the Pew Research Firm there is an attitude change with regard to gay marriage. In 2001 the percentage of people opposing gay marriage was only 57%, while 35% supported it. In 2012 the percentage of people that oppose gay marriage is even worse; it now stands at 43%, while those who support it are at 47%. Why the change?
C-SPAN cameras did not share President Obama or First Lady Michelle Obama’s reactions. Attorney General Eric Holder was nowhere to be seen.
First they told us that advertising was dead. When that observation proved to be astonishingly stupid they came up with another dubious premise to justify their unremitting defense of the Divine Church Of The Internet. It goes something like this...
The word "wishes" is from a flashcard that I stitched onto the covers. The heart was cut-out from vintage paper and colored with my copic markers. The ribbon on the bottom of the key is hand colored using my copics. The wings are embossed cut outs. The cross sections in green and cream is actually masking tape that I stitched on and airbrushed using my markers and my ABS.
“Did Chris and Sue next door get one for their kid?”
Giving customers something positive encourages additional interaction with your brand, service, or product. For this very purpose, LinkedIn added a progress bar that documents user-profile completion. But that’s not its sole purpose.
Lightly toast the bread (it will cook more in the oven so make sure you don’t over toast) and place on a pizza stone or baking sheet.
The blog that I saw this on said that they took ribbon and sewed it to ruffle it. I found ribbon that I really wanted to use but it was wired... so I thought I would try just pulling the wire to make it ruffle. Yippee!! It worked and I didn't even have to whip out my sewing machine!
Ate lobster with my mom for mother's day.
Right now my man’s mother is reading it…I’m terrified! She is walking into this one blindly too. She is not a reader normally which also scares me and she’s one of those few people whom I really give a damn about their opinion of me.So here I am waiting in repressed terror to hear her final word on whether she still wants her baby boy to bring me home for supper next Sunday night, or if she’d prefer he maybe start seeing that nice girl he dated in high school again.
this is the behind the scenes.
These are implications rather then characteristics[3]. What I mean is that when our worship of God has Him as the subject and object, when He is the center of our worship, it will honor God in His worthiness and glory over the world, develop our character as His people following after Jesus in the world, form our corporate life into an alternate community within the world, equip us for our mission to participate in God’s saving, restoring gospel work to the world, and extend His reign and rule throughout the world.
Port Brewing Company / Pizza Port Poor Man's Double IPA
1 moments
And now that I've realized this is the image in my mind, I also realize that's a bit unrealistic (just a bit.). I'm bemoaning the fact that something pretty much impossible isn't happening, and letting that negatively affect my life, and my happiness. And now that I can see that, I find that I'm already finding community.
We were introduced, and I smiled pleasantly. I always make an effort to make my best impression when it comes to my husband’s work colleagues. I want him to be proud of who his wife is in front of his peers, but I also want his peers to associate positively where he is concerned, so I try to make a good impression. I smiled and said hello, and left them to hash out their details while I worked quietly on my iPhone. From time to time, as I overheard their discussion, I would interject with an idea, or laugh at a common joke. She was taking notes in a wire notebook. The meeting lasted about 45 minutes, the three of us sitting at the barstools, me to his left, and her to his right. We said our goodbyes, and he and I left hand in hand.
That was the night I stopped singing.
April 15th, 2012
I used to work in a bar/restaurant called Roosters in Kiln, Mississippi. (pronounced "kill" and often spoken with "the" in front. Like "I live south of the Kiln", though that article isn't officially a part of the town's name.) Roosters was one of the only restaurants in the small town. The only other one I can think of was a bar called "The Broke Spoke" which was famous in two ways: for being the setting of many high schoolers stories if they owned fake IDs or knew the "right" people, and because The Broke Spoke was frequented by Brett Favre, NFL quarterback who owned a home off the bayou a farsee away.
Proverbs 18:20 from the Good News Translation says, “You have to live with the consequences of everything you say.” WOW!
I''m sitting here sneezing. Allergies! And according to the local news the temperature will be (heat index included) 110. I'll make a much needed trip to Hobby Lobby and then stay inside for some coolness.
Anyhow, I talked it up to the boy over the weekend. He was vaguely interested. This morning he was downright squirmy as we worked our way through 'What I know about maps and globes' and 'What I'd like to learn about maps and globes.'
Until recent times, that is. For since the advent of affirmative action and multi-culturalism, both of which initially were supposed to be ways of making sure all races and classes had access to social and economic advancement, America is increasingly aristocratic in its composition, with privileges being handed out according to race and class rather than according to merit.
Whatcha looking at guys?
When I was a child one of the hymns we sang often at church was called "Now Thank We All Our God." The first two verses are as follows:
No new Hindi film has been released in the multiplexes since April 4, causing film exhibitors and distributors a loss of Rs 350 crore. As a result, almost half of the 900-multiplex screens across the country have been closed by the multiplex chains in order to control their costs. Bollywood producers also incurred losses running into hundred of crores.
Released May 19, 2011.
First, the most common criticism of the book is Douthat’s account of American religious life post-World War II. In the talk, he brought this up and said that the point he was trying to make was far narrower than what many reviewers thought he was saying. The primary function of that part of the book was merely to demonstrate that Christianity had a healthier influence on public life then than it does now. Not the healthiest it could be; not some Christian ideal; just a better model than what he have now.
ONE of our featured books in our current language and literacy unit “Exploration: Real and Imagined” is “My Librarian is a Camel.” This book is a great look at global society and helps to break down local assumptions with kids about what things are – libraries arrive all over the world via camel, boat, bike, bus, elephant, and even by foot!
Hey Mike. Thanks for taking the time out to talk to me. Of course we‘re here to talk to you about your new film ‘Littlerock’.
7. Mountain West - -1.63
“We’re at their headquarters,” Regent spoke, his voice hushed.
Cops nabbed at OR Tambo
Arms: ELEGANTLY ANGLED
dies & inpression plates: fillable frames #4, in bloom impression plate
Place clean chopped veggies in a bowl. Drain tuna, chunk apart and add to bowl with the olives. Cut lemon in half and squeeze the juice over top of your salad (both halves if you prefer more of a citrus flavor). Add olive oil and salt and pepper to taste. Give it a good toss and enjoy!
" Those are hideous, you look like a reject from mermaid school"
So I kept sending her stuff. I would e-mail her a chapter or two as I finished them. She didn’t ever give me any critique or feedback, she would only say, “Is there any more?” or sometimes, “Write faster.” That’s how I finished my first full manuscript. I enjoyed every moment of writing it.
Karma is not a justification or a rationalization for the good or bad things that happen to people.
The second date might have gone even better than the first! What a great day — if it were a real date, I would be on the phone with my mom now, spilling all the details. Since it’s not, I’ll tell all of you!
Stampin Up Top Note Die,
‘It’s because the rich dont pay taxes that we’re in trouble.’
First up ~ a 12x12 title page with a few of my favorite photos from the trip!
So, here is my creative and bit bonkers award acceptance….
A longer History
“Are you okay? You’re such a lightweight.”
Or old dependency of day and night,
Hope all of you had a splendid Easter. I'll be around tonight to see how you all are after we take our daughter to the airport. Boo Hoo, I will miss her...We had a wonderful few days together, eating, shopping, talking and laughing.
Heritage Auctions Press Release: "...When this issue was released with a May 1939 cover date, Superman was the only other superhero on the stands, save for the now-obscure likes of the Arrow and the Crimson Avenger. So it's no wonder that the striking cover by artist Bob Kane made a strong impact. It has taken its place as one of the most famous covers in the history of comics. Kane and writer Bill Finger (generally credited these days as a co-creator of the character) produced a hero to rival Superman without imitating the earlier character. As Jim Steranko noted, "Superman had given DC its strength, but Batman gave it tone. Of course, Superman was more impressive... but Batman was more fascinating."
200g diced pancetta or bacon
After a lot of thinking - do we add on, do we just fix the mudroom and the seepage we're getting in the basement, do we move (the option I LEAST wanted)? We've decided to add on. Several months ago this was a much smaller project in our minds. I can hear all of you who've started that way in renovations laughing your heads off at me right now. Yes, the project has grown, much of it due to building codes, but the gist of it is below. (The lines in the drawings curve because I set the plans down on the grass to take the pictures. I assure you, our architect wasn't drunk when she rendered these.)
As you all know I'm a massive fan of book covers and I regularly post up lists of my favourites that fit into certain themes. I know we're not supposed to judge a book by its cover but, pshhh, we all do. It's impossible not to notice a gorgeous cover when browsing the shelves of a book store and a great cover design can definitely do wonders for a book.
Gian Turci was perceptive when he saw this coming and to be honest my own objections to enforced public smoking bans with law, rather than choice, was because it singled out one group of people, now defined by what they do, as a precedent for legal discrimination and social mistreatment to follow unabated and unrestrained.
1. Start by asking some good questions:
The Telectroscope will remain installed through June 15, and participation is free.
Who'll catch the star when it falls
Luigi Lo Cascio came crashing onto the Italian movie scene with this role, which he got straight out of Silvio d'Amico Accademia Nazionale d'Arte Drammatica and ended up winning the Donatello for. His wiry energy feels like a coiled spring - every so often, he explodes, and there are moments when you think of him as an otherworldly archetype for Angry Youth. Luigi Maria Burruano and Lucia Sardo are beautiful as Peppino's long-suffering parents - how they deal with the pressure is very different, and equally heart-breaking. Familiar faces - Stefano Venuti, Claudio Gioè, Ninni Bruschetta - were great to see, though their parts were relatively small, and Paolo Briguglia, as Peppino's younger brother, Giovanni, projected great sympathy.
Despite a somewhat lumpy ride (anyone who’s been on the Scillonian knows what I mean), we got there and the sun came out instantly.
by Mary Oliver
And for those of you not familiar with Roy Booth, whom I would guess are a precious few by now, he is the script guru for the "Beanie" play series, Brian Keene's TERMINAL, and R. Thomas Riley's THE DAY LUFBERRY WON IT ALL.
I was so proud that #3, my baby, got to see "THAT", if you get my drift.
Yet he pays homage to those science fiction writers who speculated on such scenarios and about the existence of the multiverse long before it became a viable scientific theory.
We've had to deal with some crazy things this month and it's just made us sad and mad, frustrated and hurt, aggravated and upset. I haven't felt like blogging lately, but I want to say "Howdy" to my new blog and pinterest followers and send out shout out to all my old friends.
I can see the button in front of me and I can take one of two paths. I can either…
you can resize
IX. Selected Bibliography.
2 T. soy sauce (or tamari or shoyu)
It would have to been written in the 60s, wouldn't it? It was the decade of the pill, obligatory daily banging for the under 25s and drug-induced naked dancing in public. Of course some officious clackhole had to standardise all the weights and measures in the UK - INCLUDING BOOZE.
Corduroy’s sweet journey is wonderfully understated, both in its opening melancholy and its closing joy. Poor Corduroy has waited forever on the department store shelf, but the children who come by head straight for the newer, brighter toys. No one seems to want a plain little bear with green overalls–especially since he’s missing a button. When a little girl named Lisa spies Corduroy, though, it’s love at first sight. Lisa is blind to the shiny new toys on the shelf–she knows that Corduroy is special. Finally, Corduroy has what he’s always wanted: a home. “‘You must be a friend,’ said Corduroy. ‘I know I’ve always wanted a friend.’ ‘Me too!’ said Lisa, and gave him a big hug.” I defy any parent or child to resist the gentle emotional tug of this delightful tale–it’s a warm, friendly, cuddly sort of story, the kind that you’ll remember for years to come.
REMEMBERING Imola continues with a deeper look into the catalogue of horrific events at the 1994 San Marino Grand Prix. A weekend that changed Formula One racing forever. 18 years on, the safety of today’s modern Grand Prix cars has improved greatly. Sadly though it happened at the loss of taking away the life of the greatest Grand Prix driver of his generation, Ayrton Senna.
I must take a break from all of the activities that have been keeping me away from this blog lately...and share a pure highlight of my day. Today the phone rang, and I answered it without giving it a thought.
1. Dice your onion, slice your peppers and mushrooms
thinking I’ll judge her
If you want to find out more or how you can participate, you can visit the website here.
I was excited as I had received everything I'd ordered and just KNEW the bits of bits of goodness swaps I participated in were back! Well...yippie for me!
Facebook contest
A history in Brooklyn
Z
We each now have our own projects back and are in the process of finishing them up. I plan to share each of the final projects on the blog and first up is Bridgette's Book of Trees.
I love computers. Except when they make me seasick.
Whenever Naruto is in trouble, he uses his sexy jutsu to suddenly create a bunch of pretty girls (Which all look like Naruto – hooray for the creepy factor!) and this technique generally causes any males that see this to suddenly nosebleed. The nosebleed is common across shounen anime, and it is used whenever a male sees a pretty girl and can’t suppress his pervert nature.
as you were
In addition to the recipes, which are categorized by the seasonal availability of ingredients (as they should be!), author Sarah B. Hood examines the current canning movement that is largely being carried out by food bloggers on the ‘net and locavores who are either growing their own produce or purchasing it from nearby farmers – all efforts that I admire (and am seeking to emulate, in my own small way). Although I’ve been a canner for quite a few years, I’m always on the lookout for new and better ways to put up produce and the recipes and stories in this book are extremely inspiring.
Such dreadful visions crowd the brain!
In true wine-o-crat fashion, the Judith Beck Blaufrankisch retails for about $20 per bottle. Unfortunately, Beck only produces 500 cases of this wine each year and it can be very hard to find so if you see it, buy it or order it. It is a crowd pleaser as my friends Jenny, Jill, Chris and Matt can attest.
“All well, enjoying as usual as you see, why don’t you sit down. Have something.” said Varun.
11. Ravelry has a weird economy of bartering. Yarn can be exchanged for other goods not related to yarn. ????? Weird.
Coming back home and switching gears to preparations for Brian's hunt, (he wanted me to go also, but the boys won, keeping me at their disposal since I was just too tired to go camping) and for the big Birthday Celebration was just plain fun.
Stepping aside from the nerd scene though, The Avengers stands proudly tall on its own merits when stripped of its Marvel branding. Not only is it damn funny in that comic book final-line-of-a-panel quip and double page, over the top art style, it also makes for a fantastic action film. Without missing a beat the action crescendos after an explosive start, balanced with interspersed, slower pace plot sequences, resulting in one of the finest fight scenes I’ve ever seen. How do you handle a whole team of superheroes fighting an entire alien invasion on the big screen? With style, finesse and punch lines, of which there is more than enough to go around. Oh, and the 3D works spectacularly well as an added bonus. There really aren’t enough words to describe just how well this film works on so many different levels.
Famous was her birthday party at Studio 54.
Our government also seduce its own people to give up their ethnic uniqueness and identity and are encouraged to wallow like swine in this festering mish mash of a violent Multi Culti society.
Above and below: Some of the stations of the spectacular Moscow Metro resembling underground palaces. The Moscow Metro is the second busiest in the world after Tokyo’s. And it carries 7-8 million passengers a day in grand style.
Bear in mind they still need editing.
We ended up staying in New York for 3 days. We stayed in a very swanky/modern (expensive) hotel in Manhattan. The hotel was filled with models because of fashion week.
But Eat. Pray. Love. suggests embracing the scariness of situations like that, and learn from the people around you. "I need to be unnerved," says Julie Roberts, the lost femme fatale, and then glances away from James Franco, cradles the coffee cup...two long blinks.
4. Can I flirt with you?
But it isn’t just Jack, Mabel and the child who compel you to keep reading. Ivey has created a wonderful cast of characters in the shape of Mabel and Jack’s neighbours Esther, George and their sons. The youngest son, Garrett, actually became my favourite character of all. A young, extremely independent boy who knows the wilderness like the back of his hand, who can aim and shoot any animal he comes across, who can provide for his family. Over the course of the novel, as Esther and Jack slowly age together, we see Garrett become a man, a man who has a chance at the life Esther and Jack always dreamed of. It’s these subtle moments in the novel that really make you appreciate Ivey’s talent and the characters she has created. Each character feels fleshed-out and real, each with their own personality and back-story. Esther and George’s family help bring a touch of lightness to an otherwise bleak and sorrowful tale, and I couldn’t help but be thankful for them, just as Mabel and Jack are.
1 elephant
The younger version of me gives me a thumbs up and then runs back through the trees and towards Lisa.
Oil’s Shame in Africa
Thus atheism has no evidential foundations and cannot by any artifice of language be logical.
Tuesday Mornings from 9 to 12
And enjoy it better with appreciation
I've thought about it all week and I just wasn't sure what to do....
Add a few of the Mexican egg rolls into the hot oil, and cook until the wrappers are golden brown, about 4-7 minutes. Remove them and let them drain on some paper towel, upright in a strainer, if you can. Repeat.
Technically it's not a huge difference from '98 Live Meltdown, but I feel as if the band played tighter, the chugging of the guitars and the force of the chords was more impacting, and it feels more genuine. It's without any doubt my favorite audio of this band with Owens (studio-wise I'll stick with the Winters Bane record Heart of a Killer), and if you've got to choose any live offering from the Metal Gods post-80s, then it might not be a poor decision. There are flaws, there are imperfections, and there is still that pervasive sense of a band covering itself due to the different vocalist, but there is more content here than Touch of Evil: Live, and the swarthy sound of the mix sounds great coming from the speakers. Not bad, and a fitting way to send this lad off, and set the band back on track after the whole sidestep that was 1996-2003.
How could it not?
In addition, my newly published volume of Comintern documents, Toward the United Front: Proceedings of the Fourth Congress of the Communist International, 1922, was published this month and introduced at the conference. The present edition, offered by Brill Academic Publishers, is a hardcover version intended for libraries. A softcover edition will be published by Haymarket Books in a year’s time.
Time preserves everything, but as it does so, it fades things to the colorlessness of ancient photographs fixed on metal plates. Light and time erase the contours and distinctive shading of the faces. One has to angle the image this way and that until it catches the light in a particular way and one can make out the person whose features have been absorbed into the blank surface of the plate. It is the same with our memories. But then one day light strikes from a certain angle and one recaptures a face again.
As Dan Hannan would probably say, “That’s another fine mess the EU control freaks have got us into”. But bearing in mind the revelations discussed throughout this week here, one wonders what illiberal, anti-democratic trick they will now dream up to declare the vote null and void?
These baked ground turkey balls can be served as an appetizer with a favorite dipping sauce or served as a main dish along side of a healthy carb and a side salad. Either way, these tiny balls of comfort are satisfying to the palate and are fun to eat.
There is no need to explain what an I-600A is or a I-171H, or define "dossier" or "USCIS." They ALL knew! We could just talk freely about the processes we were going through... some in the waiting phase, some in learning how to attach to their newly welcomed child. There were women there adopting from all over... Ethiopia, The DRC, China, Korea, Uganda, Ukraine, Russia, Colombia, and many from even the USA. Between the 400+ of us, we represented homes for around 1,100 children! That is amazing!
